CHAPTER I.
THE YOUNG COLONIST.
THE soft, roseate haze of an autumnal sunset was just deepening
into the obscurity of twilight, as a young man came forth from
the door of a humble dwelling that stood in a narrow court not
far from Cornhill. The air was mild, and not a breath moved the
scarlet leaves of the maple that overshadowed the lowly roof of the
house. There was a little yard in front between the step and the
court, which was ornamented by a few shrubs and plants, and by
each side of the door stoop were three or four pots of geraniums and
rose-trees. These were green and fragrant, and the former were in
flower, thus betraying careful nurture, while all else in the yard was
feeling the first touch of autumn. The two round plats of closely
shaven grass, not larger than a chaise wheel, with the circular paths
around them, were strewn and filled with dead leaves, which rustled
to the tread of the youth, as he passed with a quick step from the
door to the latticed gate.
He wore a broad-brimmed straw hat, and a light brown
frock-coat
buttoned to his chin, displaying the fine development of his
manly chest. He was of good height and finely shaped, with a
certain air of nobleness in his carriage and step, that outward
expression
of the figure which indicates a frank, generous and bold
spirit within. His age was about four-and-twenty. The shadow
cast by his hat over his features did not bring their outline into view
with sufficient distinctness to judge accurately of their character.
They seemed, nevertheless, to be handsome, and lighted up by a
finely brilliant eye beneath a dark brow, which was something
flushed, as if with some recent excitement.
He carried beneath his arm a stout stick, as if it were a constant
out-door companion. He had closed the door behind him as he
came out, but as he laid his hand upon the little gate, which was but
twelve or fourteen feet separated from it, the door was re-opened by
a young girl, who, looking after him with an earnest expression upon
her lovely features, called in a low tone,
Fleming!
Mary! he answered, in a kind manner, removing his hand from
the gate, and turning back to the door-step upon which she stood.
You will not be gone long, will you? she asked, laying her hand
in his. Come home before nine.
I will be at home as soon as I can, sister. But you must not be
alarmed if I should be out after the bell rings.
I do not fear for myself, as we shall not be, probably, disturbed
to-night again to billet the soldiers, but it is for you. You are so
quick and impetuous, and your act in expelling the soldiers from the
house will bring the vengeance of the dreadful lieutenant-governor
upon you.
I do not fear him nor his tools, Mary. It is probable that he
may send here to arrest me. You will obey me by having the bar
placed across the door, and by keeping the windows closed. I will
send Saul round at once. As soon as you let him in, keep all close
till I come back. The soldiers will not dare to break in! Every
man in Boston would make the cause his own! Keep courage! I
shall see the governor before any order is issued, and it is for this I
am hastening. I will face him in person, and represent the matter
before him in a fearless and independent manner. I do not fear the
tyrant Hutchinson, Mary. Do not fear for me. I shall return to
you soon, and assure you of our future security. I would not leave
you at this crisis; but by going without delay to the governor, I may
prevent the evil you fear.
Be respectful before him, I again entreat you, Fleming, said the
young girl, looking up into his face with her deep-blue eyes,
expressing
mingled admiration, love and timid apprehension.
I shall speak before him as a man, and one of the true born sons
of liberty! answered Fleming, with firmness. Now, good bye!
Remember, as soon as Saul comes, to keep the doors fast. He will
be a host in himself, poor soul as he is, for he is brave, faithful, and a
lion in strength. Keep heart, Mary. All will yet go better than
you mistrust. I do not regret what I have done!
With these words he kissed her with fraternal tenderness, and
releasing
his two hands from the clasp of hers, he hurried out of the
gate, and disappeared down the Court in the direction of Cornhill.
The maiden listened until his footsteps could no longer be heard
by her, and then folding her hands together, she looked up to the
azure skies, where, here and there, a far, faint star had began to
kindle its altar-fire, and fervently addressed a prayer for the safety
of her brother in his present hour of peril.
She was scarcely past seventeen, a sweet, gentle girl, with eyes
that seemed to have stolen their color from the heavens, towards
which they were up-turned. Her soft brown hair was combed back
from her pure brow, and fell upon her neck in shining tresses. Her
features were delicately moulded, and almost angelic in their
expression
of goodness and truthfulness. Her lips were like those of a
young child, red and ripely full, and pouting with beauty and love.
Her form was slight and fairy-like, and expressive with the spiritual
embodiment of every womanly grace.
While she still stood in the door, and again was listening, for she
detected fresh footsteps coming up the court, each foot-fall heavier
and louder, a man approached and opened the gate.
His appearance was singular and striking. In height he was full
six feet and eight inches, huge in the breadth of shoulder, and heavily
massive in all his proportions. He was a veritable giant. He wore
a blue woollen cap, with a red tassel dangling behind, a gay jacket
of Scotch plaid, yellow breeches, and scarlet hose. In his hand he
carried a huge cricket-bat, spoon-shaped, at the extremity and from
one of his side pockets projected an enormous leathern ball, the size
of a foot-ball.
Oh, Saul, I am so glad you have come, said Mary Field, in a
tone of pleasure. I was afraid Fleming wouldn't find you!
Brother Flemmy, Menny, al'ays knows where to find brothey
Saul, answered the giant, in a voice like that of an awkward boy
just at that peculiar crisis when his voice is changing from juvenility
to manhood. His face, too, though the features were large and
suited to his size, was like that of a boy of eighteen, though his age
could not have been less than twenty-six or seven. The general
expression
of his countenance was kindly, although his restless grey
eyes indicated a temperament that it would be as fearful to rouse as
to stir to anger the unbound lion.
You must come in, Saul, and bar the door, said the maiden, in
the manner of one who gently rules.
I don't want to be in the house a bit, Menny. The stars be
comin' out, and I and the stars have pleasant times togethy, when I
am sittin' a thinkin' on the round hill on the commy!
You shall go on the common to-morrow night, Saul. Come in
now and bar the door. The soldiers have been here, and I fear they
may come again!
Did they say anything wicked to you, Menny? asked Saul,
quickly.
No, Saul. But come in. You must be my guard!
That I will, Menny, answered the giant, taking her cheeks
affectionately
between his finger and thumb, as one would an infant's.
If I had been home, an' the sogies had come to harm you, Menny,
I'd ha' killed 'em! I wouldn't mind knockin' 'em on the head no
more than I would my ball!
As he spoke, he grasped his bat like a quarter-staff, and gave it a
flourish around his head that made the wind rush again. He then
stooped, bending nearly double, and entered the house. Mary closed
the door after him, and then was heard the sound of an iron bar
falling
heavily across it into its bed; for these were times when barred
doors were the only safeguard against the insolence of the British
soldiers who were then quartered in Boston. At the time of our
story the popular mind was in a violent state of agitation from the
tyrannical spirit manifested by the English ministry, at the head of
which was Grenville.
The American colonists had exposed themselves to unparalleled
dangers and hardships to lay the foundation of an empire where
liberty of conscience might prevail. Civil liberty is the offspring of
religious. Religious freedom is political freedom. The colonists
early learned to know the value of liberty. They early began to
cherish it next to their religious faith, out of which it grew, and which
was the soil in which it was nourished. They therefore looked with
careful eye and ever watchful suspicion upon the measures of the
mother country in reference to them. They could not but be
otherwise
than jealous of the legislative acts of a power which they knew
loved them not for flying from its abuses and persecuting power.
In the relation which they held as a colony, however, they had
willingly submitted to taxation for the purpose of sustaining the wars
waged against the Indians and the French. But when these wars
were ended, the necessity for taxation ceased, as the colonists had
within themselves resources sufficient for their own existence.
When, therefore, the ministry in the mother country proposed not
only to continue the tax as heretofore, on the plea that the revenue
was needed to defray the expenses of defending, securing and
protecting
the colony, but also resolved to levy duties by the
infamous
Stamp Act, the colonists beheld in this procedure
despotism
,
usurpation and tyranny of the most bare-faced character. They
saw that England was jealous of their flourishing commerce, and
that led by her sateless avarice, and her imperious desire of power
and dominion, had resolved both to profit by it and at the same time
to restrain it. They saw that so far from being satisfied with
engrossing
all the commerce of the colonies by heavy duties that
amounted to prohibition on all goods imported into them from places
not subject to her rule, she sought to make them the slaves of her
lust of riches, and to turn into her own coffers the wealth of colonial
commerce.
When the report, that a bill to levy a stamp-duty on every written
or printed paper drawn up or issued for any legal or business
purpose
in the colonies, had been passed by parliament and signed by
the king, reached the shores of New England, the excitement through
all classes was indescribable. The principles of despotism were
unfolded at one view in the despotic bill, and the flame of resistance
to this act of oppression and tyrannical power spread from one end
of the land to the other.
The news had reached Boston the morning of the day upon
which our story opens. The excitement throughout the town was
great. Men left their several pursuits and places of business to
assemble in crowds at the coffee-houses, custom-house, court-hall,
and other public places, to talk over the matter and strengthen each
other's purpose to resist this aggressive act.
The lieutenant-governor, the notorious Hutchinson, witnessing the
popular agitation, and becoming alarmed, sent over to the castle for
troops, which he stationed at different quarters of the town, some in
King-street, near the State-house, others in Cornhill, others in the
square west of Fanueil Hall; for he apprehended, such was his
plea, some outbreak of the stern passions of the people. As night
approached, the citizens mostly retired to their houses peaceably,
and Hutchinson sent detachments of his soldiers to be quartered in
the private houses of the townsmen until the next day, there having
been neither barracks nor provision provided for them. Some of
the more forbearing citizens received the soldiers, fearing to resist
the authority of a man so despotic and vindictive, knowing that it
would be only for one night, while others more resolute closed their
doors against them. The soldiers passed such quietly, having orders
to use no violence, but to report all who shut them out.
A small detachment seeking quarters had marched up the court in
which Fleming with his mother and sister lived, and having drawn
up before the gate, a young officer knocked at the door, demanding
admittance. Fleming was at tea, and leaving the table with an
angry face, for he had seen what kind of guests they were through
the trellised foliage of the window, he opened the door. He knew
the young lieutenant well, and the recognition did not smooth his
temper at the prospect of having twelve huzzars quartered in his
home for a night, and perhaps longer. He had heard already of the
order of the governor, and his sense of justice had caused his spirit
to kindle at the gross outrage put upon the town. He had not yet
heard, however, that any one had resisted it.
What do you wish, sir? he demanded, in as quiet a tone as he
could assume towards the officer, an imperious young man, who had
once, on a Sabbath day, followed his sister Mary from church to the
house, and insisted on entering with her, when Saul met him face to
face in the entry, and hurled him nearly over the gate. Saul had
afterwards pointed out the young officer to his brother, and although
Fleming had never spoken to him, he had marked him.
I intend to quarter here with twelve men, the last left unprovided
for of the detachment I command, answered the officer. Sergeant,
he added, turning round, fall into file and march in!
My house is smallI cannot accommodate you, sir, answered
Fleming, firmly, as he placed his person in the door-way.
I have orders from the lieutenant-governor, young man,
answered
the officer, with a pale and angry lip. I shall obey it!
March forward, men!
You cross this threshold at your peril! cried Fleming. I have
not the strength of my brother, to hurl you into the court, but I have
a spirit that will resist oppression. My house is my castle! You
enter it at your peril!
Fleming stood before the English officer with a look of that
terrible
calmness which awes. His arms were folded upon his chest.
He held in his hands no weapon. The officer gazed for an instant
upon him with an air of indecision, his eyes lighted up with fierce
resentment. He turned his head twice, as if to give orders to his
men to rush upon the daring young colonist, but at length, as if he
feared the consequences to himself, for he saw that he would be the
first victim of such an attempt, he replied,
Very well, young man! I forbear to give orders to my men to
cut you down, as you deserve, for this audacity to a British officer
this defiance of the governor's authority. I will leave your
punishment
in his hands; and when you find yourself in prison, he added,
in a malicious tone of triumph, you may console yourself that I am
dallying here with your lovely little sister!
Fleming would have sprung upon him and hurled him to the
ground, if, anticipating the effect of his words, he had not retreated
quickly, and placed the gate between them. Fleming would still
have gone after him, but Mary laid her hand upon his arm.
Brother! she said, in a low, sweet voice of expostulation that
he ever listened to in the most angry moment.
Mary?
Let him go! Do not take any rash step! You have not yet
raised your arm against them, and it is best it is so!
Go in, Mary! He lingers to gaze upon you!
Farewell, pretty one! cried the English huzzar officer, and he
touched two fingers to his lips, and waved them with an air of
gallantry
towards her. By-and-bye we shall be better friends, my
fair puritan!
It was with difficulty Fleming could restrain the impulse to bound
forth upon the insulter, and punish him, in the face of his soldiers,
for his insolence; but the mild voice of his sister held him back.
Fleming, do not bring his vengeance upon you. For your sake
for
my
sake, endure!
I will let him pass for the present, answered the indignant young
colonist, as the officer, whose name was Cleverling, and who was
the younger son of a British nobleman, walked menacingly down the
court, followed by his soldiers.
Fleming re-entered the house, and was persuaded to resume his
seat at the tea-table; but his feelings were too much agitated to
enable him to finish the meal. After a few minutes he rose from his
chair and took down his hat.
Fleming, you will not go out, now that you are so much excited,
and while danger menaces you from this incensed officer. Remain,
dear brother, within, and think no more of what has passed.
Whatever
you do will only fan the flame!
Mary, you know not what you say! If I bear tamely this
outrage
if
every man bears it without a word, we are made slaves.
Hutchinson shall know that he must not place his foot upon the necks
of free-born men. If he imagines we are like the degraded English
peasants at home, he will soon find the difference!
But what can you do, Fleming? You are a young man, scarcely
known, and perhaps stand alone in the refusal to admit the soldiers
into your house. If resistance is to be made to this tyranny and
despotism of the governor, it should begin with the rulers of the
townwith the rich and influential!
All fires that are lighted begin to burn from the ground upward,
Mary, answered the young, colonist, moodily. But I am not the
only one. I know that there are a thousand as free-beating hearts in
Boston as my own. I have witnessed this day a spirit pervading
men's bosoms that makes me feel proud that I am a colonist!
I have heard that the town's-people have said bold words to-day,
since the news came that the stamp-act bill is passed, said his
mother, a tall, dark-eyed, intelligent woman, with a face expressive
of that firmness and nerve which singularly characterised the matrons
of that day.
If you had seen and heard what I have borne witness to, you
would have gloried in a land that contained such noble spirits as
have this day manifested themselves throughout the streets. There
seemed but one heart and one mind, mother! From the shoemaker
to the judge in his gown, but one sentiment prevailed, and this was a
resolute purpose to resist this aggressive act of the tyrants over sea!
It was for fear that it would take head and bear down his authority,
that the cowardly Hutehinson sent for troops from the castlethese
very troops which he would now quarter upon us. It would seem
as if he would feel the pulse of our forbearance, and guage to the
depth our slavish submission. For one, I thank God that I have
resisted
his power!
I fear some dreadful evil will befall you and ourselves, my son,
from the governor's resentment, said his mother, with looks of
anxious solicitude, when what you have done shall be reported to
his ears with all the exaggerations of malice. I would advise you
to absent yourself from the town for a few days, Fleming, until the
matter is a little blown over. If you remain here you will be
arrested.
I do not fear it, answered Fleming, boldly.
But I fear it, brother, said Mary Field, with anxiety. Do as
our mother advises. Go this night, this hour, to Cambridge, to your
grandfather's, and there stay until I let you know that you can safely
return.
And leave my dove-cote to the mercy of the hawk! No, Mary.
I will at once to the presence of the governor. I will forestall the
news of what I have done, by telling it myself. I will speak to the
governor as a man to a man. I do not fear him. My eye will not
quail before his eye, nor my voice falter at the sound of his own.
Do not say a word. I am resolved! It is the only course for your
safety, and for my own. Do not fear for me. I feel that I shall be
sustained by every true heart in the town. It will bring out and
show to the friends of liberty who are men!
As he spoke, he placed his hat upon his head, buttoned his
outercoat
closely over his chest, grasped his walking-staff, and prepared
to go forth.
Brother, promise me that you will be discreet, if you still will go
to the governor, said his sister, laying her hand upon his arm.
I will be so. I shall say nothing unbecoming myself or my birth
as a free colonist. Now do not follow me out. God bless you both!
I will ere long return with good news to you. I will first find Saul,
and send him hither.
With these words he left the room and the house; but, as he was
passing through the little gate, was recalled by his sister to the door,
as already related in the former portion of this chapter.
Mary Field was a firm and courageous girl. She was fondly
attached to her brother, but not with weakness. She thought with
him and like him, in reference to the subject of their conversation,
and approved of his going to the governor in advance of the officer,
though she strove to temper his fiery spirit with the calmer influences
of her own.
CHAPTER II.
THE TWO PATRIOTS.
FLEMING passed out of the court and entered Cornhill, then one
of the principal streets of the old town of Boston. The
darkness
of night had not yet set in, and objects and persons near
could be seen and recognized with ease. He passed southward in
the direction of the old State House, near which he observed a group
gathered. As he came near and thrust himself forward among the
people, some fifty or sixty in number, who stood silently gazing upon
some object, he discovered that it was a piece of artillery with the
muzzle pointed at the windows of the Town Hall, opposite which was
lighted up. Around the gun were stationed four or five soldiers.
While he was looking at it and was about to ask a citizen what it
meant, a loud cry was raised from the north outlet of King street.
Clear the way all! Stand back men!
The call was echoed sternly by the soldiers about the gun, who,
at the same time, with their sheathed sabres began to drive back the
citizens.
Fleming extricated himself from the rushing mass, and looking down
King street where he heard the heavy rumble of wheels and the tramp
of feet, and beheld advancing a second piece of ordinance drawn by
horses, followed by soldiers, and attended by two officers on
horseback
.
He stepped back to let the whole pass. The gun was
trundled
round into Cornhill and wheeled into its place abreast of the
other. The horses were unharnessed and driven off, while the
soldiers
who had accompanied the piece, prepared to load it. The two
officers sat looking on in their saddles in the space left by the
citizens
;
while the latter remained aloof, gazing upon the scene with
mingled emotions of fear, surprise and indignation. The latter
feeling
alone had place in Fleming's bosom.
What means this outrage? he asked of a man who had resisted
the soldiers, and only retired after having wrested from them and
broken
one of their sheathed sabres.
It means, that we in Boston are fast becoming slaves to the King
of England. The passage of the Stamp Act has emboldened
Hutchinson
,
and you see what he does! The act is nothing more nor
less than a law and command for him and all others in power in the
colonies, to bind us and make bondsmen of us.
Give me your hand, William Lee. Your heart and mine beat to
the same measure.
William Lee grasped the outstretched hand of Fleming. The act
and words were noticed by those who pressed near.
I am glad to see that the young men feel what they ought to, as
well as we who are older, said a man with grey locks. It is time
the colonies all took the alarm.
And they will take it, mark me, friends and townsmen,
answered
William Lee, a strong, stout ship-wright, in an energetic voice.
The express rider that went to-day with the news to York and
Virginia, will leave fire in his path.
What means these two cannon posted here, William? asked
Fleming, who was watching the soldiers as they were loading and
levelling it.
It means that the general court shall not do any thing that
Hutchinson
don't like, answered the ship-wright. These cannon are
placed here to overawe our colonial authorities. The court are to
sit under the mouths of the king's cannon.
Let us drag them into the dock! cried a voice from the crowd.
Patience, friend. All in good time. This is but the beginning.
Let us not be too precipitate. The nut is not yet ripe for the
cracking.
This was spoken by Fleming in a low but impressive tone.
Yes, all in good time, as Fleming Field says, answered William
Lee, the ship-wright. You see, Fleming, that the town-hall is
lighted to-night. There is to be a meeting of the general court and of
such of the townsfolk as choose to attend, to deliberate upon the course
best to be pursued when the stamped paper arrives. The governor
has ordered up the cannon to keep them from speaking too freely.
And yet, answered Fleming, there is no man in that assembly
who will withhold the free expression of his sentiments, were the whole
British force to surround the hall, aye, stand within it. I have seen
bold brows and heard the echo of brave hearts to-day.
So have I, young man, responded Lee. Do you know that
there has been full fifty doors barred against the soldiers that
Hutchinson
would have quartered upon their hearth-stones.
I am glad of that! cried Fleming, with animation. I knew we
were not all slaves in Boston. I also was honored by a detachment
of a dozen huzzars, with young Captain Cleverling at their head.
You!why should so gay a gallant pass the rich man's portico to
disturb you in your humble home?
I asked not his motives, responded Fleming, with a cheek
heightened
by the quick blood; but I did not let him enter. He left
without
crossing my threshold, though none but a free man with a
fearless
heart and strong arm stood upon it.
Bravo! cried Lee. The word was echoed by the crowd; and
Fleming recollecting his mission to the governor, withdrew from the
throng, and passing with a proud step and an air of calm defiance,
in front of the cannon, and so close to the soldiers as to brush against
them, walked rapidly up the street. He had not gone but a few steps,
when Lee overtook him, and laid his hand on his arm.
Fleming, where do you go? You and I must know each other
better. We are one in this matter.
I shall be glad to act with you for the good of the country,
William
Lee. I foresee that something will come of this besides mere
passive resistance.
Yes. The people are up. The colonies will not consent to this
usurpation, believe me. You have seen what spirit was brought out
to-day. Every man speaks his indignation openly. The news is
flying south and it will thrill every true bosom. Great events will
follow this madness of the ministry. When we heard a few weeks
ago that such a bill was to be brought before parliament, not one
sensible man ever thought it would pass. We worked idly upon the
issue, therefore. But to-day has opened our eyes. We see the
cloven-hoof
,
Fleming, and we must be watchful. This is only a grand
scheme to make us a colony of serfs.
I see that it is so! I am young and not so well skilled in politics
as you are, William, but I can read what is written so plainly upon
the wall. I can translate for George of England the hand-writing;
and it is like that of God's to Belshazzar`Thy kingdom is
finished
!'
Bold, but I do believe true words, young man. But whither do
you walk so fast? Shall I go with you?
I will let you, though I intended to go alone. I am going to ask
an audience of the lieutenant-governor.
Of Hutchinson? asked Lee, with surprise, and half checking
his steps, for they had been walking on side by side while talking.
Yes!
For what end. Do you know him?
I have seen him, and I know his character, William.
He will not speak to you. What can you have to ask of him?
Come with me and you shall hear in his presence. I have no
time to explain now.
Well, I will go with you. I see you have some determined
purpose
on your mind. If evil come to you, or wrong has already been
done you, in me you will find a friend.
I thank you. I need no friend that my country needs not. He
who serves her serves me. He who is my friend is hers!
You speak the very thoughts of my own heart, Fleming Field.
Ah, who is that who passed and spoke to you? I have seen him with
the governor.
It is a young gentleman, his secretary.
He spoke kindly.
He is my friend, I believe.
Trust none of them, Fleming.
I think he is honorable.
He may be. I bluntly tell you, I have no faith in any English
born, especially those of blood.
He is not high-born. He is as humble in birth as myself.
Then I like him the better. But it is strange the proud,
highborn
Hutchinson should have in his house, and so near to his person,
one of lowly origin.
There is a story touching his birth and life that I will tell you
sometime if you ask me, which will explain this. But here we are
near the guard-house of the governor's mansion!
I see the sentries are doubled, and that a detachment of his
bodyguard
stand under arms by the gate. You see the coward trembles.
He will not admit you.
He will! answered Fleming, firmly.
You are a very determined young man. I can take lessons of
you, and better men than I. But these soldiers are under marching
orders. They are tramping this way. Suppose we stand aside and
let them pass on.
Not for British soldiers, Lee. We must let them see we do not
fear them. They will grow insolent now, that by the news of
today
they see how the king regards us, and we must hold ourselves
firmly as men and free citizens.
Your words are as full of wisdom, young man, as your heart of
courage. We will not stand off into the street. We will give them
full space, and stand our ground.
They stood still by a post, awaiting the passage of a column of
about thirty men. As they came near the officer in command, who
had been detained in the rear after it had left the door of the
guard-house
,
advanced to its head. It was light enough for Fleming to
recognise
his enemy, Cleverling. He at once understood that he was
marching to arrest him in his house, with an order from the governor.
His first impulse was to step boldly forward and confront him. But
he trembled for the fate of Mary, unprotected and exposed to his free
admiration and bold presence, and pressing quickly the arm of
William
Lee, he said:
Let us precede them at a quick pace, while I say three words to
you.
They then walked rapidly back the way they had come, keeping
about thirty paces ahead of the column which was advancing along the
side-walk in column four abreast, at double quick time, and without
music.
William, this party is doubtless sent to seize upon my person.
Do not think I am escaping from fear. I have a favor to ask of you,
and only wish to gain time.
Speak, and it is done! answered the shipwright, warmly.
The party that I ejected from my house, was commanded by the
officer who commands this. At the time some words passed between
usI knew well his motive in seeking to billet himself there, lowly as
our estate is. He has conceived a wicked passion for my sister Mary,
whom he has already insulted by his notice, and passing by loftier
roofs, he pounced upon mine. I knew the man and his motives, and
I gave him the reception both merited.
Cleverling intrudes himself on the presence of Mary Field.
You did well. But go on!
He left the door, and marched off with his men, breathing
vengeance
and the wrath of Hutchinson against me. For myself I cared
not; I thought only of those dear to me. I resolved to
Let us move fasteras the officer is hastening. I would not have
him know who you are! We are but two to thirty, here.
I resolved to anticipate him, and see the governor in person, and
represent to him the truth. Besides, I am inspired with a strong
desire
to speak a few plain words to this man's ears! Now, this party
behind us are doubtless moving towards my little home. I wish you
to hasten thither in advance, and stand in the gate, and tell them I am
not there. I leave to you this trust. You will do it better than I.
I shall, and will do it! But do not say anything rash to
Hutchinson
.
But take my advice, and go not near the man. It will be
putting
your head into the lion's mouth.
I do not fear him. Besides, it is but arrest there or at home, for I
will not hide from him like a criminal.
Nor should you!
I have done nothing but what every brave man should have done.
If I am put under arrest by him, I shall have for friends every patriot
in Boston. My imprisonment will be a sifter, and show what is chaff
and what is the wheat among us.
You ought not to risk so much for this end.
I do not for this end. I have higher motives. I do but speak of
the results that would follow. And, William, should I be detained by
the governor, I leave my little fold at home to your charge. Saul is
faithful and brave where those he loves, as he does Mary, are in
danger
,
but Saul is not proof against duplicity and art. I leave her to
you.
She is as safe as in a castle, Fleming. I have only to give the
rallying cry, and four hundred stalwart hands, with stout weapons in
them, will be at my side. So fear not for her. If you have a mind
to see and talk with the governor, go! Your pretty sister shall be
safely guarded from all harm, and if Hutchinson dare lay a finger on
you to injure you, let him beware. His canon, nor his guns, would
avail the cruel coward.
We will part hereI up this street, you through that avenue.
Good night! Remain at my house an hour after the bell rings nine,
and I will be there.
I hope so. If not, I shall see that you are looked up.
With these words the two friends separated at a corner of the street,
in the dark shadow cast by the drooping branches of a tree that
over-arched
the walk. The officer, Cleverling, had evidently been
hastening
his steps to overtake the two men he had seen turn and precede
him; but they walked so rapidly, that unless he had fairly run, he
could not have come up with them. But as he had no suspicion who
they were, he let them continue on; when at length he thought he
recognised
Fleming's voice, as for a moment he elevated it. He was
about to call on the leading platoon of four men to rush forward with
him to ascertain, when they parted at the corner; and when he came
to it, neither were visible, nor could he hear a footfall to guide him.
He then proceeded on his march in the direction of Fleming's abode,
for thither was he destined, for the purpose, as the young colonist had
suspected, of arresting him, and bringing him before the governor,
who, infuriated by the numerous failures of his soldiers to get quarters,
and the number of houses of the chief citizens closed against them,
resolved
to make an example of Field, whose case he regarded as the
most aggravating of all; for Cleverling had not failed to report it with
every coloring that malice could dictate.
After the division passed on, Fleming let himself down from the
tree into which he had drawn himself up after Lee left him, and took
his way rapidly a second time towards the governor's residence. This
was a spacious and very elegant mansion, separated from the street by
a broad, ornamented court-yard, adorned by a fountain and several
statues. It was approached by an imposing alley, paved with smooth
flags, and bordered by shrubbery. On the left of the gate, which was
arched and crowned with the royal crest, gilt, stood a small
guard-house
,
capable of containing ten or a dozen soldiers. Before the gate
always paced a sentry with a musket at his shoulder. As Fleming
came up, he saw two walking alternately opposite ways, like sentries
in a besieged camp; for Hutchinson's cowardly fears made him
unusually
vigilant. He had seen evinced that day, a spirit he hardly
believed existed in the land. He had hitherto seen the people
submissive
and quiet, even under his vexatious rule; but the annoyances
to which he subjected them were petty and local. They did not
involve
any great principle. The colonists were pacific and loved quiet,
and so let his low acts of personal despotism pass without replication
than irony, sneers, contempt, or pity, and always with more or less of
detestation. But when a principle like that of civil liberty was moved,
the people who had hitherto been indifferent to what could not be well
mended, suddenly seemed to be new created. He found a lion
beneath
where he had lifted the lamb's skin. He was amazed; and not
only amazed, but frightened. He drew around him soldiery, and
planted cannon in the streets. He issued proclamations every half
hour from his house, wherein he kept himself with double sentries for
his protection; for he had had it whispered to his trembling ears, that
men said that he had first suggested to Lord North in a letter, the
infamous
project of levying the stamp duty.
When Fleming came to the guard-house, before the mansion he saw
by the lights which shone from the illuminated windows, for the
governor
had candles placed in every window, to expose clearly every
object in the court and street beyond the gate, he was challenged by
the sentry.
Who comes?
A citizen! answered Fleming, approaching still.
Stand and give the countersign.
We citizens are not apt to be made guardians of such military
secrets, especially in time of war.
In time of war, young fellow! repeated a tall slender officer,
who was just coming out. What do your words mean? Who are
at war?
England with her colonies, I believe.
How so? We are not yet, nor likely to be.
Then why are our streets planted with her cannon, our halls of
justice besieged, our homes intruded upon by her soldiery? Why
does the king's governor hold himself in the house with defences about
his person, as if in a leaguered castle? What can war do more than
all this?
I, faith, not much, that is the truth, young man, responded the
officer, laughing; and passing out of the gate, he mounted a horse held
by an orderly, and galloped up the street.
That seems a good-natured officer. Who is it? asked Fleming
of the sentry.
It is Colonel Barry, of the sixty-fourth. But what do you wish?
To see the governor. I have not the pass-word, but I have
something
to say to him of moment. You will oblige me by sending in to
ask him if he will let me see him.
The pleasing manner in which Fleming spoke, caused the soldier
to address himself to one of his comrades off duty, and send him in with
the request. The man returned and reported that the governor could
see no one of the town's people.
Take him this; and tell him the bearer waits, said Fleming,
giving
the soldier a gold seal.
The man hesitated; but the air of decision with which Fleming
gave him the order, induced him to comply. In a few moments he
came back and said, respectfully,
His excellency desires me to conduct you to him.
CHAPTER III.
THE LIEUTENANT-GOVERNOR.
FLEMING followed the orderly up the broad avenue of the front
court, and entered the door of the mansion. A sentinel was also
stationed there. In the hall several young officers were lounging
and conversing, who stared at the colonist as he passed them, and went
into the governor's room. It was a large apartment, richly furnished,
and hung with paintings of the first masters. Elegant cases, filled with
books, were between the windows, and in two of the corners were
marble statues, from Grecian models. The room was lighted by a
chandelier of wax candles. An air of wealth and luxury characterised
the whole interior; for Hutchinson greatly loved display, and although
he possessed few qualities to render him a popular governor to the
colonists, he was a man of educated tastes, and of no
inconsiderable
intelligence and talent.
Here is the young townsman, your excellency, said the orderly,
as he opened the door and stood aside for Fleming to enter the room.
The lieutenant-governor looked up, for he was seated at a table
with books and papers before him, and after fixing his dark grey eye
steadily upon the face of Fleming, he said, as the orderly retired,
You desire to see me. I had nearly forgotten you. What is it
you wish?
The privilege of saying a few words to your excellency,
answered
Fleming in a firm but respectful tone.
I can hear them where you stand! said the governor, with a
quick suspicious air, as Fleming advanced a step or two. You are
near enough to me. Say what you wish, for you must be aware that
time is valuable to me just now.
The governor spoke in the manner of one who would act with
kindness
;
though still with an air of impatience, as if he would have liked
it quite as well if his visitor had not intruded upon his presence. The
suspicion conveyed in his nervous desire, that Fleming should not
approach
any nigher, was understood by the latter; and he smiled
scornfully
at that timidity which saw an assassin in every one who came
near his person.
Your excellency, said Fleming, with that free manly bearing
which always characterised him, I have sought an interview, not to
ask you for any recompense for the light service I was so fortunate as
to afford you and your daughter. It is true I used the seal you gave
me, but it was only when my first application was unsuccessful. I come
to claim no favor of you on the score of a service done, but to demand
a right.
Demand! This is bold language! said the governor, his brow
bending darkly.
I speak it with all respect, sir. I have sought you to ask of you
that protection which it is your duty to extend to the humblest in the
colony, and the humblest in the colony to claim as a sacred privilege
from the governor.
What is it you wish? How can I protect you? asked the
governor
,
looking with surprise upon the fearless countenance of the
speaker.
Sir, I am a young artisan. I maintain a mother and sister by the
labor of my vocation. We live in humble style, as becomes our
fortunes
.
To-night a party of soldiers came to my quiet home, and with
arms in their hands, demanded to be admitted. I knew that we were
at war with no nation. I did not ask who was their king, or what
their country. I knew none but a lawless party would make an
attempt
to cross a peaceful threshold, and so I thrust them forth. Did I
well or ill, your excellency?
Were not those British soldiers, young man?
I have said I asked not their name or nation. If they were foreign
soldiers, I did right in thrusting them forth. Were they British
soldiers
,
I did no less; for by what right do British soldiers intrude upon
our hearths. When English troops get to conduct like sacking
enemies
,
and enter our houses, who shall condemn us if we meet them as
foes, and bar our doors against them. This I have done, Governor
Hutchinson; and I have come here to demand redress, if these men
prove to be British troops, for the outrage they have put upon me, a
free born subject of the kingyour king, their king, and my king?
Gov. Hutchinson gazed upon the young man with looks of
astonishment
.
He was confounded by the new position in which the outrage
he had authorised, had been placed by the bold colonist.
Young man, if you have turned soldiers from your door, you well
knew they were British troops! he said sternly.
Then I demand, by what authority do British troops enter and
desecrate my house, that altar, sacred to every manI mean every
man who has a freeman's heart beating in his bosom?
Do you profess ignorance of my order, issued this day.
What order?
That the citizens should for one night quarter the soldiers, give
them food and lodgings.
And by what authority did you issue this order? Who gave
your excellency power to invade the sanctity of our dwellings! to
send your lawless hirelings into our homes, to insult and riot, and
pollute? Sir, you were placed in your high seat to govern and
protect
,
not to tyrannise and destroy. You have no right to cross the
lowliest threshold in the colony in person, without permission of the
owner and master, much less have you authority to send armed
soldiery
.
I have resisted your despotic order, and I am ready to bide
the issue.
Do you defy me, young man! Do you know that you are in
my power,that I can send you home to England as a traitor?
I have weighed well the consequences. I have acted from a
principle that had its birth in heavenlove of liberty.
By the king's head! I should not be surprised if you were the
very person that Cleverling has gone to arrest. Was Lieutenant
Cleverling at the head of the party you refused admittance to your
house, sirrah?
He was, your excellency.
He reported to me your conduct, but did not give your name. I
gave him orders to bring you before me.
I have anticipated his intention, your excellency. I knew that
he would endeavor to get my arrest effected, and I therefore came
to see you in person. On my way hither, I met him and his party.
I have voluntarily placed myself in your power.
What an extraordinary young man!
Courage and patriotic virtue are, I doubt not, wonderful in the
eyes of those who do not possess them. But I came not hither to
insult
your excellency.
It is well for you to say this now, responded Hutchinson, pale
with rage, but yet looking upon him with a respect that he could not
throw off. Do you not fear me, that you have placed yourself in
my power?
No, sir. I have come as your friend, Governor Hutchinson. I
know that among the towns-people, there is not one that will tell you
frankly the truth. I have come to save you from yourself.
Explain! What do you mean? What new danger menaces
me? asked the governor, with lively suspicion.
You have seen, sir, the exhibition of feeling which the news of
to-day has produced! You have witnessed a firm purpose of
resistance
to the oppressive Stamp Bill. All parties have alike to-day,
in the streets, in their shops, in the coffee-houses, on the wharves, in
every place of public resort, expressed in words not to be mistaken,
and the echo of which will yet reverberate through the halls of
Parliament
,
their indignation at the passage of the bill, and their resolute
determination to resist its enforcement. There is not a man so weak
and ignorant, who does not see in it the links of the chain that
Britain
intends to cast upon our necks. They see in it her purpose to
weigh us down to the earth by taxes, as she has done her own
groaning
population.
I do not wish to hear such language, young man. You presume
too much upon the favor you once chanced to afford me, to speak
thus boldly.
No, your excellency. I should speak as freely, had I never been
so fortunate as to save you and your lovely daughter from sudden
death, by drowning. I think not of this while I speak! I have come
hither as your friend. I wish you to know the strong feeling that is
aroused among men. I wish you to forbear increasing it by any
acts of your own. At once withdraw the troops from the city, and
send back to the castle the artillery that is planted in front of the
State-house. Keep no guard, beyond one of mere honor, about your
person, and take no active steps with reference to this infamous
Stamp Act, until the order to do so arrives from the king. By this
means you will conciliate the people, additionally outraged by the
presence of the soldiery in the streets and in their houses, and you
will avert from your own person a fearful doom. There, is, your
excellency
,
a time when long suffering ceases to be a virtue. The
people have hitherto borne much from you. They are in a mood to
bear but very little more. If you would secure your own personal
safety
,
and restore quiet in the town, you will send back the troops
without
delay, and appear openly before the people without a guard.
This confidence in them will disarm their resentment, and cause
them to visit their indignation upon the ministry at home alone, in
petitions and remonstrances, instead of adding to them vengeance
upon your own person as their tool.
The governor listened to the words of the young colonist with
deep attention, now his cheek kindling with anger, now paling with
fear. He rose and took two or three turns across the room, in
troubled thought. At length he turned, and said to Fleming,
What motive has influenced you to come to me?
A desire to prevent a hostile conflict between the town and
troops, and partly from that feeling which leads us to serve those for
whom once we have done a service!
It may be so, it may be so, he answered, thoughtfully, and
regarding
him with a look of scrutinizing suspicion; but, young man,
I dare not trust to your advice. I have no doubt all you say is
truth, touching the danger that menaces me; and at the worst I can
retire to the castle and defend myself!
True; but is there any necessity of bringing affairs to such a
crisis, your excellency? One musket fired, one drop of blood drawn
in such a position of things, and, believe me, England would lose
her colonies!
Do you mean to say that you would take up arms to resist her
authority? asked the governor, contemptuously.
Yes, your excellency. Every coersive act on your part will
hasten this posture of affairs. If you are a friend to the king, you
will show yourself a friend to the colonies!
You are a wonderful young man. I know not what to make of
you. You seem as honest as you are bold. But you will not think
it unnatural if I suspect your sincerity, and believe that you are sent
to me by some of the leading colonists, who wish to have me remove
the troops in order to take the town into their own keeping, and
doubtless imprison me in my own house!
Fleming glanced at the lieutenant-governor's face to see if it did
not manifest a blush of shame at this open expression of cowardly
apprehension; but fear was a natural attribute of his excellency, and
his cheek retained its pale hue. Fleming was not a little indignant
at this suspicion, and was about to make some reply in character
with his emotions, when a young female entered from a half-open
door, and approached them. At the sight of her, the young colonist's
brow was heightened with a crimson blush of pleasure and
embarrassment
.
He dropped his eyes before the power of her beauty and
presence, and bowed with confusion. The governor did not observe
him, as the light fall of her footstep had caused him to turn his
head.
Ah, Lucy, you are impatient for me to join you at the tea-board,
he said, smiling upon her, and expressing, in tone and look, a
tenderness
for her that at once covered, in Fleming's eyes, all his faults of
character. This young person you have seen before, he added,
pointing to Fleming.
Yes, and I am glad to see that he has not forgotten to call and
see those who owe to him so much, said Lucy Hutchinson, with
grace and kindliness of speech and manner; and walking forward
to where Fleming stood, she extended her hand to him, and said,
with a blush, as she dropped her eyes before his adoring gazeI
now thank you for your service to me. At the time, you fled from
my thanks, but here you are a prisoner!
Nay, I do not mean to detain him, Lucy, after all that has
passed, said the governor, taking her words in that literal sense,
which they might indeed bear. You must know he has been
barring
his doors against
I know it, sir. I was present when Mr. Cleverling made his
report; and had I known then that it was this noble young man
whom he was authorised to arrest, I would have interposed more
warmly than I did; for I know that such an arrest would greatly
irritate the town. I have overheard all your interview in the
adjoining
room, and come to enforce Mr. Field's words!
Do you think he is sincere, Lucy?
I should be ashamed to suspect him to be otherwise, sir, she
said, her eye kindling with shame at her father's suspicion, and
casting
towards Fleming an apologetic look for her father's weakness.
What he says to you, sir, are the words of wisdom and discretion.
You have greatly angered the people, sir, first by your unguarded
expressions of joy at the arrival of the news that the Stamp-Act had
received the king's signature, then by calling over the soldiers from
the castle, and lastly by billeting them in the private houses of the
inhabitants! We owe this young gentleman the deepest gratitude
for this open and disinterested act of friendship in coming to you,
sir, and making known the danger that must follow the continuance
of the troops in town!
But suppose I send them back, and then the mob should be in
the humor to take umbrage at me because I recommendedI mean
because they
suspect
that I recommended to the ministry the
Stamp-Bill
for
no one can prove it upon me? You know what they have
been threatening, daughter!
The only way, sir, said Fleming, is to show confidence
towards
the town's-folk. This will disarm all animosity, and secure
the safety of your person.
Well, I will think of it. I will consult with the commander of
the troops.
And he, father, will urge you to retain them in the town; for
they like their quarters here better than in the castle!
I have received no remonstrance from the General Court, he
answered, moodily. It is time enough then to send away the
soldiers. What is this boy's words?
Truth is truth, whether offered in a wooden bowl or in a golden
vase, answered Fleming, firmly. I have spoken, sir, for your
safety, and the happiness of those dear to you!
As he uttered these words, he looked towards the maiden with
an expression in his fine eyes of ardent yet modest admiration. She
was not insensible to the glance, nor did it displease her; for the
slight flush of emotion that passed across her features proceeded
from pleasure rather than from anger. High-born as she was, being
the grand-child of a marquis, as well as daughter to the powerful
governor of the colony, she was not indifferent to the fact that she
had created in the breast of the handsome young colonist a sentiment
of timid admiration and worshipping devotion. She did not, by any
means, regard him without some embarrassment of feeling. He had
been in her thoughts often since the time when they first met, three
months before. Fleming had been to Cambridge to take his sister
to her grandfather's, who dwelt in a small farm-house on the banks
of the Charles River. He could go to the very door in a boat, and
had taken one for the conveyance. On his return, as he was
entering
the back bay, he saw a six-oared barge crossing. He knew by
the flag in the stern that it was the governor's. The wind was
blowing strong, and a vessel near her, which had missed stays,
suddenly
was driven into her. The oarsmen sprung to save themselves
by clinging to the fluke of the anchor and martingale, while the boat
parting, sunk, leaving the governor and his daughter floating upon
the agitated waters. Fleming was but a short distance from the
scene of the disaster, and hastening to the spot, succeeded in rescuing
both the maiden and her father, just as they were about to sink
together
;
for, forgetful of his own safety, the governor had used every
effort to sustain his child above the surface. The sloop hove-to and
took them on board. The governor, in his gratitude, forced a
valuable
seal upon his preserver, saying, that whenever he wished his
aid, to come to him or send that. When Lucy Hutchinson had a little
revived, and wished to thank her gallant preserver, they pointed out
to her his little boat dancing over the waters, and approaching
rapidly the foot of the Common.
From that time she had thought much of the young man, and had
felt the greatest desire once more to see him; and having overheard,
the interview between the young man and her father, and
recognising
the voice of the former, she entered the apartment to express her
thanks.
When she now beheld him, the advocate of humanity and the bold
friend of his country, his naturally handsome face lighted up with
the fire of patriotism, she could not withhold, in her heart, her
admiration
and interest. When she saw that he regarded her with similar
feelings, a gentle joy was infused into her heart, which throbbed with
new and strange emotions. She saw at once the motive (
her
happiness
)
which had brought him before her father.
I will think about the matter, at length answered the governor.
Young man, you are at liberty to go free. I will send after
Cleverling
and order him to return. Until he comes back you had best
stay within; for, if you encounter him in the street, there may be
difficulty, and I want no more occasion for getting the people up!
I will not remain. I shall not fear to meet him!
You had best delay, Mr. Field, said Lucy, earnestly. It is
better you should not meet the party.
I cannot resist your request, Miss Hutchinson, said Fleming.
If you will walk this way, said Lucy Hutchinson, I will try
and entertain you with some portraits of the principal personages
now figuring in England. This is Lord Norththis Bute'sthis
Grenville's, she added, as she conducted him to the opposite side
of the large room, and pointed out to his notice the likenesses of
these friends and supporters of the odious Stamp-Bill.
CHAPTER IV.
THE PORTRAITS.
THE young artisan gazed upon the portraits of his country's
tyrants
with deep interest, and feelings of stern indignation rose
in his bosom at the reflection that through their agency, the
colonies
were in danger of losing those liberties which the
pilgrim-fathers
had purchased with privations and self-denial unparalleled in the
foundation of a new state. He was not, without feelings of deep
restraint
against the governor himself, who, having given himself to the
examination of some papers after his daughter had walked aside with
him, seemed to forget their presence. His resentment towards him
were, however, modified by regard for his daughter, whom he had
not ceased to remember with a sort of romantic devotion, since the
time he had been the instrument of her rescue. It was for her sake
he had sought the presence of her father, resolved to endeavor to
move him to measures less violent than those he was pursuing; for
he saw that the vengeance of the people would by-and-bye outbreak
upon his head, and that the innocent child would be involved in the
ruin of the guilty parent. For her sake he had spoken so boldly and
earnestly; though at the basis of all lay a sincere and earnest desire
to benefit his fellow-colonists. The idea of resistance to the
despotism
of Great Britain by arms, had not been thought of, even amid the
intense excitement of the day past. Men breathed aloud their sense
of injustice of the ministry, and spoke boldly of their determination to
resist the operation of the new law; but petitions, remonstrances,
committees to wait on the king, these only were the arms they thought
of to save their liberties from destruction. It was ten years prior to
the declaration of independence, the seeds of which eventful act were
sown this day in the bosoms of the patriotic colonists. They did not,
however, foresee the important issues; few, very few bold and
fore-sighted
minds, only, had the least conception of such a vast result.
Among those who most firmly spoke agianst the injustice of the law,
were men fondly attached to the king and mother-country, who felt
themselves a part of the great empire, and loved England, the home of
their fathers, the endeared mother-land, with an affection nearly
equal to the soil on which they were born. But these men were
not
Englishmen in slavish submission to power. They loved liberty.
They had tasted its sweetness in freedom from the oppressive taxes
under which the people in the mother-country groaned, and they had
jealously resisted, by respectful petition, every attempt of the
ministry
,
hitherto, to lay upon them the same burdens.
When the report that a bill to levy a stamp-duty upon all written or
printed papers in the colonies reached them, the return ship took back
back earnest petitions, praying that such a bill might not receive the
sanction of the king; and sensible men hoped that these
remonstrances
would be successful. And when, at length, the intelligence came
that the bill had passed both houses, received his majesty's signature,
and become a law, resentment, grief, and a spirit of resistance filled
every bosom. Men spoke freely their minds, and murmurs against
the lieutenant-governor were loud. He was termed a traitor to the
interests of the colony, and the cries of down with Hutchinson!
reached his own ears as he sat trembling at the consequences of the
volcano he had been so rash as to kindle by his suggestion of the
stamp-duty. It was from a fear of his personal safety, that led him
to send privately to the eastle for the troops, whose presence had only
served to increase the popular indignation against him. He at length
scaled, as if led on by a blind fatality, his unpopularity and odium by
the order which he issued for the citizens to take care of them in
their houses.
The consequences to himself of these injudicious measures, to give
them their mildest appellation, were at once foreseen by Fleming; and
while he felt the deepest anxiety on his sister's account, and entered
fully
into all the feelings of his townsmen, he trembled for the safety and
peace of the lovely and high-born English girl who had not been out
of his mind in the last three months. He therefore combined several
motives in his visit to the governor's mansionprotection to his sister
and his own home, a desire to be a mediator between the governor
and the town, and a wish to avert from the head of the fair maiden,
the calamity which pended over her father's, and in which she
Lucy Hutchinson, the Governor's Daughter.
was equally involved; for, if even she was personally unharmed in
any outbreak of the people, her father's misfortunes, he knew, she
would feel to be her own. Love has more than once been the spur
to noble deeds.
Fleming continued to gaze upon the portraits, but oftener diverted
his eyes to the living and breathing portrait by his side. Her face
was, indeed, worthy of the deep and earnest looks with which he
stealthily regarded it, while his entranced ears drank in the liquid
music
of her rich voice as she discoursed to him of the characters of the
various personages whose pictures hung upon the wall. Her figure
was tall, yet not a hair's-breadth too much so, and grace and feminine
dignity reposed upon her brow as upon their native throne. Her hair
was a bright chesnut brown, bound at the back of her head in a
knot of shining tresses. Her eyes were large, of a very dark hazel
color, and sparkled with soul and feeling. Intelligence and
sprightliness
animated her beautiful features, and softened the character of
firmness which the occasional resolved compression of her finely cut
lips indicated. She was habited in black, a net shawl being drawn
closely over her shoulders, finely displaying the graceful roundness
of her bust and faultless elegance of her form. Her age was about
twenty, perhaps a few months less, for a certain grave decision in
her air, which took nothing from her loveliness, gave her the
appearance of being maturer, perhaps, than she was. There was
too, about her that indescribable
tone
of high birth which seems to
belong
to the noble families of England; but in her it did not take the
aspect of pride or hauteur, but rather manifested itself in a refined
gentleness of manner that could only spring from a refined mind and
native amiability of character.
Such was Lucy Hutchinson, the beautiful daughter of the
unpopular
governor. As she accompanied Fleming from picture to picture
along the wall, they came to the open door through which she had
come into their presence.
You asked me if we had the likeness of Sir William Pitt, she
said, smiling. I see you are likely to think more of that than of
the three others I have shown you. If you will walk into the next
room you will find it hanging there. The governor has banished it
from his library.
I am glad then to see that you have taken it under your
protection
,
Miss Hutchinson, said Fleming, with an earnest and grateful
manner, as he followed her into a drawing-room, more richly
furnished
than the apartment in which they had left the governor.
It was also, like that, brilliantly lighted up, as indeed was every
apartment of the mansion, for the timid ruler of the colony was
apprehensive
of an attack under cover of the night, and had taken this
mode to prevent a surprise, the radiance from the lighted windows
being cast far around the edifice to many rods distant.
There is William Pitt! said the young lady, pointing to a
venerable
and noble head.
I should have known him without being notified, said Fleming,
as he gazed upon it. In his face speaks a generous and daring
spirit as well as wisdom and intellectual power. How different are
the expression and character of his face from those of the arrogant
Lord North, the haughty Bute, or the sycophantic and heartless
Grenville
.
Miss Hutchinson, such a celestial aspect, for he looks a god,
could never be listed on the side of wrong and oppression. Did these
two men, Lord North and Sir William Pitt, now stand before you, and
each asked you to follow them to fame and honor, taking different
paths to it, which would you follow?
The maiden gazed up into his beaming eyes as he addressed her
this question, and regarded him with admiration, not unmixed with
surprise. At length she answered,
I should not hesitate. I should follow to fame and honor, if
either, that man! and she pointed impressively to the portrait of
Pitt.
I knew you would make this answer. Every true and
generous
spirit would reply as you have done. In one of those two men
you behold the despotic noble who would oppress us. In the other
the fearless defender of our liberties. I cannot look into the face of
Miss Hutchinson and believe for a moment, that she is the friend of
the oppressor; that she cherishes principles which that great and good
man would frown upon; and he elevated his hand towards the
portrait
of Chatham, at the same time watching her face with deep
attention
.
I am not surprised at your boldness of speech, sir, she
answered
with a richer color; since I overheard all that you have said to
my father. But,
If I have offended you by my freedom, pardon me, Miss
Hutchinson
,
he said with deep respect; but I am a colonist. I feel as
one, and cannot but speak as one.
You have not offended me, sir, answered the maiden, with some
hesitation. I honor you for your frank avowal of sentiments that
no one should be ashamed to possess. She spoke in an under tone,
but with distinctness.
Is it possible, that I hear these expressions from the lips of the
daughter of the governor! he answered in the same depressed key.
It is not of necessity that I should think with my father on a
subject
upon which every one can form an opinion. I feel for, and
strongly sympathize with your colonial friends in the oppressive
measures
of which the ministry are making you the victims. I have been
with you long enough to understand and respect the character of the
colonists. I know you are a brave, intelligent, forbearing and
liberty-loving
people. I have watched with pain the progress of events
towards
this crisis, and when to-day the news of the passage of the
stamp-act reached me, I shed tears. I wept for your wrongs; I wept
for the infamy that would fall back upon my country.
Fleming listened to her as if in a dream. To hear such sentiments
from the daughter of the oppressor, Hutchinson, amazed him. He
stood gazing upon her spirited and animated countenance with
emotion
and delight. Impulsively he took her hand, bent before her on
one knee, and pressed it to his lips. She withdrew it, with her face
covered with blushes, but without betraying anger.
Forgive me, Miss Hutchinson; but I feel towards you new
emotions
.
I could lay my life down for you. From this moment you
are next to my sister in my heart and thoughts. Pardon my words.
I am bold, to speak as I do to one of your birth and dignity of rank
I, a poor artizan. If I have offended, forgive. I shall never forget
how happy you have made me. Dare I confess to youfor you look
as if you would listen without displeasuredare I confess to you how
much I have thought of you since that day I was so happy as to save
you. You have scarcely been absent from my mind. It has made
me both happy and wretched to think upon you; sad to know that you
were the daughter of one who loved not my native land, and that you,
perhaps, loved it not; sad that, however much I might dwell upon
your image, it could be only to worship afar off; for rank and
circumstances
had placed you far above me and my station. Happy to know
that nothing could ever rob my memory of the sweet remembrance of
you; and that though we never met again, I should ever hold it sacred
in my soul. I have said, I fear, Miss Hutchinson, what I had better
have left unsaid. But I could not resist the impulse to speak to you
of the fullness of my heart. I shall go from you, at least, conscious
that you are the friend of the colonies; and, for your sake, I shall try
and love your father. It was for your sake that I came to advise him
and warn him to-night. But I will not say another word. I have said
too many already.
Fleming, answered the maiden, who had listened to him with a
changing cheek and an agitated bosom; I am not displeased at your
boldness, though I do not know but that I ought to be; yet I will
forgive
you, for I know not how to be displeased with one to whom I owe
my life.
I do not desire to gain any clemency from that circumstance,
answered Fleming. Yet this fact has made me think of you, when,
perhaps, I ought to have tried to forget you. If, however, I am
forgiven
,
and you have a kind remembrance of what I have been so
happy as to do for you, will you allow me to take the only advantage
of it that I desire to do.
What is it you would say? asked Miss Hutchinson, looking him
in the face with an encouraging expression, yet looking confused;
for she could not guess what he meant by his words.
That you would use all the influence you possess, to urge upon
your father, mild and forbearing measures towards the people over
whom the king has placed him in power and authority.
That I will cheerfully do. It has hitherto been my aim to make
him more popular with the colonists. I have not been blind to the
position he holds in their estimation, and which reflects upon me;
for I experience the coldness of the ladies of the commonwealth,
whom I esteem, and whose opinions I respect. But my father is an
Englishman in all his feelings, and shares with the nobility in all their
prejudices against the colonies. I have talked with my father by the
hour, laying before him the just claims of the people to his
consideration
,
and endeavored to convince him of the unavoidable painful
results
that must follow a system such as he is pursuing.
And what does he answer you, noble and generous maiden!
That he only obeys the spirit of the government at home. He
says that he is placed in power here, not to please the humors of the
colonists, but the wishes of the king and his ministry. To day I have
talked with him, since the arrival of the news that the Stamp Bill has
passed and become a law.
And what did he reply? asked Fleming, with deep attention.
That his course towards the colony was mild, compared with
that of the monarch.
I am sorry that he should argue in a way that implies a natural
love for oppression. Pardon me, but there is no necessity for such
petty tyranny as that with which he rules us. Clemency and
kindness
would not bring him into disfavor with the king, while it would
gain him friends with us here. The governor is not either king or
ministry, that he should play the despot. A governor should be a
friend both to the king and people. But Governor Hutchinson is the
king's friend and the people's foe. He rules like an autocrat among
serfs! like a general over a conquered province.
I am aware of the great cause you have for censuring my father.
I grieve at his course, and would cheerfully sacrifice my life to heal
the wounds his injudicious rule has caused in the popular mind.
Does he suspect your partiality for the cause of the colonists?
He does not. I have been cautious while I have been zealous.
He attributes my earnestness only as the result of a womanly desire
to have peace. He loves me tenderly; but should he suspect how
strongly I feel, I fear that I should lose over him even the little
influence
that I possess; for I have been so happy as to prevent his
doing much more than he has done, to make his government oppressive. It is painful for me to speak in this open way of my father, but
I know I speak to one who will not betray me, and who possesses
nobleness of nature and generosity of character, sufficient to
appreciate
my feelings, and fully sympathise with my position.
You do me but justice, Miss Hutchinson. I do sympathise with
you, with all my heart. If I can serve you, command me. It is
true, I possess but little influence as a citizen, and am but little known;
but all patriots will be, and are my friends.
You can serve me, by using your influence to appease the
popular
mind. Assure men that the governor will be just, and that they
may confide in him. After what you have said to him to-night, for
which I thank you sincerely, he will reflect, and I do believe, act with
more discretion. I am sure he regrets his precipitancy already. His
error has been in forming his opinion of the colonists, from his
knowledge
of the masses at home. The spirit evinced this day, has shown
him his error.
He has been long enough ruler over us to have discovered it
before
.
But he has kept aloof from us. He has stood above us, and
governed us, as if he dwelt in another planet. His pride and his
prejudices have prevented him from mixing freely with us!
All this has been wrong, and done him much injury among those
whose good opinion would have sustained him in power.
But it has done us great good, Miss Hutchinson, responded
Fleming, impressively.
How? I would that it may! she answered, with a look of
surprise.
By showing us the excellency of liberty. He has taught us to
contrast it with despotism. By his despotic mode of governing us,
he has taught us how his master will govern us when he binds upon
our necks the iron chains of the Stamp-Act. The king had better
stamp with hot irons, as slaves are branded, his royal seal upon each
of our forcheads, to tell the world we are his slaves. He could do
no more, if he did this, than he does by forcing this stamp duty upon
us!
Would to God the king had been wiser than his ministers, ere he
had done this, or his ministers had been more just! answered Miss
Hutchinson, with emotion. I see not where all this will end!
It is a dark cloud that overshadows both lands. We are already
a great nation, colonists though we are, Miss Hutchinson. There
are five hundred thousand men among us whose knees have never
bent, nor ever will bend, to the king's tyranny. These men can bear
arms and have power to construct a separate empire in this land in the
very face, and in defiance of the king, if he goad them to desperation.
After the passage of this act, I do not see that any mercy or favor is to
be extended to us. Bow in submission to it we will not!
I shudder to fill up, or even contemplate the picture that you have
so forcibly outlined. My fears tell me you have drawn that which will
be. On the first of November this act goes into operation. It is close
at hand. What dreadful consequences must follow the attempt of my
father to appoint the officers of revenue and enforce the law.
We must prepare for it. I see that if he persists in his present
hostility to us, and his slavish submission to the will of the monarch,
which he even transcends, that judgment will fall upon him.
Do not prophesy. The evil I know will come, but I feelthat I must
stop my ears.
Danger shall not come nigh you, Miss Hutchinson. You at least,
shall escape the consequences of your father's conduct. In me you
have a friend, and through me, friends in all my friends. I shall not
let you out of my thoughts a moment.
Kind and noble young man. But I shall little regard my own
personal safety while my father is in danger. I will talk with him
before
I sleep. I will lay before him the subject in all its bearings. I
trust I shall be able to change his policy.
If you induce him to send the troops back to the castle early in the
morning, you will gain a great step for him in favor with the incensed
towns-people.
This I pledge myself to, she answered resolutely.
As she spoke, Cleverling's voice was heard in the adjoining
apartment
.
CHAPTER V.
THE MEETING.
THE time has now come for you to depart, said Lucy
Hutchinson
,
in a low voice. This interview with you has given
me firmness and hope in this trying emergency. I shall
always feel that I have in you a friend whom I can confide in at all
times!
You honor me, Miss Hutchinson, answered Fleming, with a
bright ray of joy dancing in his eyes, as they were bent upon her
beautiful face. I shall always be ready to serve you. Without
betraying the interests of the colony, I can advise you whenever
danger menaces you or your father. But even you, fair lady, could
not make me a traitor! What I shall communicate to you will be
for your personal safety. Do not fail, in the meanwhile, to urge
upon your father mildness and clemency.
I will not, answered the maiden, firmly. My father calls to
me. Farewell!
Shall we not meet again? asked Fleming, earnestly, as he held
her hand in his lingering yet respectful grasp.
Yes. I shall always see you with pleasure. But for my sake
do not fail to use your influence with the town's-people to forbear.
Patience and charity on both sides will prove the only protection
against scenes of contest that I tremble to think upon! Remain
here for a moment. I would rather that you and Mr. Cleverling
should not meet.
As she spoke, she withdrew her hand from his, but not before a
kiss had been impressed upon it, which caused the maiden blush
to mantle check and brow. The next moment Fleming was alone.
He could not but hear all that passed in the adjacent room, as
Cleverling
spoke in a loud tone of indignation, though his conversation
with Lucy having been conducted in an under voice, passed not
beyond
their own ears.
What do you report, Lieutenant Cleverling? asked the
governor
,
after Cleverling entered.
That it is time, your excellency, prompt and severe measures
were taken with these colonists! answered the young officer, in an
indignant tone. Ah, Miss Hutchinson, good evening! he added,
as he saw Lucy enter.
The maiden bowed slightly, and advancing to her father's side,
stood by his chair, leaning upon it with one arm.
What has transpired, sir? demanded the governor. You
have not found the young colonist, I know, because he has been with
me, and I have pardoned him!
Pardoned him? repeated the officer, with surprise.
Yes, I have thought it best. His arrest would have created an
uproar among the town's-people, as I find he is popular with them.
It is better to be pacific and conciliate!
Thanks, dear father, for those words, said Lucy, in a voice of
deep gratitude and joy, but speaking only to that he himself could
hear.
He and his family, your excellency, cried Cleverling, deserve
rather to be hung up by the necks. I have met with treatment that
I never experienced before, and your authority has been openly
despised!
In what way? What has occurred? You did not find the
young man. What then has happened to cause such agitation?
I will inform your excellency, answered Cleverling, pale with
anger. In obedience to your orders, I marched with a strong
detachment
of thirty men, a force which I supposed quite sufficient to
overawe any of the neighbors who might be inclined to interfere. I
reached the house, though not without meeting with various insults
as we passed along the streets, such as being pelted with missiles,
and called after with cries of approbrium even by the ragamuffin
boys of the market-place!
What cries did they utter? asked the governor, looking
displeased
and alarmed at these popular exhibitions of hostility.
Down with the red-coats! Down with Hutchinson! No
Stamp-Act
!
Liberty forever! No tyrants! No North! No Bute!
Down with the Parliament!
This is getting to be a serious affair! Such bold language,
uttered in the very face of armed troops! cried the governor,
sternly. These colonists have too much freedom. It makes them
lawless. The Stamp-Act was needful, or, by the king's throne!
they would rebel and set up a king and parliament for themselves!
But what further happened? Instead, you see, Lucy, of sending
back the soldiers to the castle, I have need to double the number in
the town!
Had it not been for the presence of the soldiers, father, these
cries would not have been uttered! answered the young girl,
firmly.
I see that Miss Hutchinson is favorably inclined towards the
colonists, said Cleverling, in a sarcastic manner.
My daughter, sir? No. She speaks thus only because she is a
woman. She is a true king's subject, Mr. Cleverling. Did I
suppose
she felt for them, I would call her no daughter of mine! But
what more? he asked, impatiently.
I reached the court where the house at which I had been refused
admittance was situated. I was followed into the court by a rabble
of not less than a hundred men and boys. I had twice to order the
rear to face about and present their bayonets to keep them from
crowding us, they were so insolently bold!
You should have fired upon them, sir! You should have fired
upon them, Mr. Cleverling! exclaimed Hutchinson, in a voice of
rage. Had you killed a score of them I would have sustained
you!
No, father! One drop of blood thus spilled, had it been a child's,
would have been followed by fearful carnage. I commend Mr.
Cleverling for his forbearance!
I thank you, Miss Hutchinson. Your approbation is so rare in
reference to me and my acts that I shall duly value your praise!
This was spoken in a tone cold and ironical; for Cleverling had
been an admirer of the maiden, but had wooed without success, as
she perceived in his character traits that not only withheld her love,
but respect. Now, whenever they met, it was with cool politeness
on both sides. He took a malicious satisfaction at such times in
repaying
her refusal to encourage his addresses, by throwing irony
and sarcasm into nearly every word addressed her. She, however,
paid no regard to this system of petty revenge, being perfectly calm
and unmoved by it. I thought it not safe to order my men to fire,
your excellency, continued the young officer, and forebore with
them. Upon reaching the front of the house. I drew up my men
and surrounded it. I then demanded admittance in the king's name.
There was no reply. I thrice made the same call upon those within,
and then ordered four men up to break in the door with the butts of
their muskets. They obeyed, and the door gave way. I was then
rushing in with my sword drawn, when I was suddenly caught up
by a huge giant that lodges there, and thrown into one of the side
rooms as if I had been a bundle of straw! The fellow shall pay for
the act if I live to execute my vengeance upon him! He then seized
two of my soldiers and threw them out of the door, knocking down
with them three others who were behind them. Then grasping a
heavy club which he carried, he laid about him as Sampson did with
the jaw-bone of the ass, and in a moment cleared the yard of my
men. I leaped out of the window of the room in which I had been
thrown by him, and rallied such of my men as were not disabled, for
five of them were either lying or seated upon the ground unable to
stir. Infuriated at this reception, I gave orders for the men to charge
bayonets and carry the house by storm!
You did right! This is a fearful state of things! cried the
governor.
It would not have happened, father, if you had not brought the
troops into the town, said Lucy, firmly.
Silence, daughter! I shall begin to think with Cleverling that
your sympathies are with these insurgents! Did you charge upon
the house?
I was about to do so, when a stout fellow came up to me and said,
`Captain, if you are wise you will retire with your red-coats as
peaceably as you can; for, if you attempt to push a bayonet or pull
a trigger, not one of you will ever get back to your master
Hutchinson
alive! The man you seek is not here!'
He spoke in a deliberate tone, and with a determined resolution
of manner that impressed me. I reflected a moment, and seeing
that the court was filled with the crowd, I thought it best to forbear
for the time. So I gave the command for my men to march, the
crowd quietly and silently giving away on either hand for me to
pass through to Cornhill. The wounded men were borne along
each by two of their fellow-soldiers, until I got to the battery of
cannon in front of the State House, where I left them in charge of
those on duty there. I then marched hither without delay to make
my report.
And an alarming report it is, responded the governor. This
is a strange state of things. I see that an example must be made.
They will not learn a lesson till one or two of them have been strung
up or shot!
I would recommend your excellency to order all the force at the
castle into the town, said Cleverling, and put the place under
martial law. I would have this gigantic idiot arrested and shot, for
you could not find a rope strong enough to hang him with! The
young man, Fleming Field, I would also arrest and make an example
of him. If such an outrage as that which has been done to-night is
suffered by your excellency to pass unnoticed, the town will be
unsafe
for us. It would sound bravely in the ears of those at home,
the report that the king's troops had been driven out of Boston by
the town's-people!
Such a report shall never reach England while I am acting
governor
of this commonwealth, answered the lieutenant-governor,
pacing the apartment like an enraged tiger. This comes of
forbearance
and clemency!
Pray, father, what forbearance and clemency have you shown,
out of which these scenes have sprung? asked Lucy Hutchinson, in
a fearless manner.
So! you are half a colonist in heart now, I'll be sworn! cried
her father, turning upon her a fiery glance of suspicion. Where is
this young Fleming Field, whom I caused to be detained from
clemency
,
for I did not wish Cleverling to fall in with him after I had
promised him pardon? Has he done looking at the pictures yet?
I am here, your excellency, answered Fleming, entering the
room. I have been waiting your pleasure.
My pleasure, then, is that you be arrested for this outrage upon
Mr. Cleverling and the soldiers under his care, done at your house,
and doubtless at your instigation. You have heard his story?
I have overheard it, your excellency. The reception your
officer met with would have been no less severe had I been present
in person!
It would not, fellow? cried Cleverling, who had witnessed his
entrance with profound surprise, which was changed to indignation
and glances of menace, as he caught the firm, calm eye of the young
colonist.
Do you utter such words in my presence, sirrah? demanded
the governor, sternly.
If Mr. Cleverling strove to enter a free citizen's house by force
of arms, he was served right in being ejected forcibly!
We shall see how that is, young man! Who was this giant he
speaks of?
My elder and only brother, your excellency. Nature has denied
him intellect, but endowed him in lieu of it with vast stature and
Herculean strength. He has but little sense, yet the possesses strong
affections. His love to his mother, his sister and myself would do
honor to the kindest heart. He guards our home with the
faithfulness
with which a lion watches over her young. In casting forth
your officer, he but obeyed the instincts of his love; and I thank God
that he hath endued my brother with strength of body to
accomplish
that which his heart prompted him to do!
Your brother shall be arrested, answered the governor. If he
has wit enough to defend his house, he is responsible for his actions.
I am not to pass lightly by the injury done to five of the soldiers by
him, to say nothing of the defiance of the king's authority, and of my
own. Cleverling, you will take a sufficient force with you early in
the morning, and bring this man before me. I shall detain his
brother until you have executed your order. You may now retire
to your quarters.
Suppose, your excellency, that I meet with resistance?
Fire without hesitation upon every one who dares to oppose
you! I commission you to keep the king's peace, and if these mad
colonists break it, let it be at their peril!
It shall be, sir, answered Cleverling, as he turned to leave the
room. Am I to understand that this young man is a prisoner?
Yes! answered the governor, after a moment's hesitation.
Then I will take him and place him under guard, if it please
your excellency.
Do so, for he is not secure here!
Mr. Cleverling, said Lucy Hutchinson, stepping between him
and Flemingfor he had returned after reaching the door, and
drawing his sword, approached the young colonistthis young
man is free! My father gave him pardon and permission to depart.
Governor Hutchinson never yet broke his word! Mr. Field, you
are at liberty to depart!
Her father looked at her with surprise. He made several attempts
to speak, but kept silent. He seemed to fear before his noble and
firm daughter. Cleverling glanced from him to her, as if to see
which would govern. He saw the father's indecision yielded before
the daughter's resolution. Nevertheless, his determination to secure
Fleming at all hazards, combined with his dislike of the maiden, led
him to resolve to apprehend the person who stood in the way of his
lawless intentions towards Mary Field.
Mr. Field, if that is your name, he said, laying his hand upon
his arm, I arrest you in the name of the king, and by virtue of this
warrant, signed and sealed by the king's governor!
Do you dare, and in this presence? cried the indignant girl, her
eyes flashing with haughty scorn.
I have received no countermanding order, Miss Hutchinson!
Till I do so this man is my prisoner! Ho there, without!
His call was responded to by two soldiers, who had accompanied
him to the outer door. They entered and looked at him for further
orders.
Seize that man and secure him! cried Cleverling.
Soldiers, leave this presence! cried the indignant maiden, and
you, Lieutenant Cleverling, also depart! Do you insult the governor
in his own house? It is you, sir, who should be placed under arrest
were I in my father's place! Depart, sir, and presume not too
much upon the governor's clemency!
Fore God, daughter! cried the governor, you had best take
my place and done with it, for I see you are playing the governor
before my very eyes! I shall have to put you under arrest if you
carry so high a hand!
Did you not, sir, pardon Mr. Field? Did he not remain here at
your suggestion till this officer returned, that he might not be
arrested
in the street? Will you now falsify your word, sir, and surrender
him to the charge of a man who, for some reason or other, seems to
bear against him private malice? While I am in your presence, sir,
I will not see you thus wrong your own honor! Mr. Field is free,
and, being so, should be suffered to depart!
Well, he shall go then. Mr. Cleverling, you may retire. When
I have further orders I will send for you!
Cleverling bit his lip with the most intense vexation. He would
have answered freely, and spoken his mind to the governor, if he had
dared. He retired, fixing upon Lucy a glance of defiance and
triumph, and upon Fleming a threatening and malicious look.
Now, Mr. Field, you are at liberty to return to your own home,
said the governor. You see my weakness. I have yielded to my
daughter rather than acted as my position dictated. I gave my
word to let you go free, and I keep it, as you see! But let me
caution
4
you, young man, about resisting the troops, or heading any party
against the lawful authority of the king. Let my clemency make
you my friend and the friend of the king!
I would ask, your excellency, if it is your intention to send to
arrest my brother? demanded Fleming, in a firm but respectful
tone.
No; I will answer for my father, said Lucy, quickly, and
placing her arm affectionately over the governor's shoulder, and
smiling in his face. He will not take any further measures that
are likely to widen the breach between the people and the crown!
How so, girl? answered the governor, with a frown, yet still
with that air of affection towards her, which never deserted him.
Am I governor of this commonwealth, or are you?
I do not wish to rule, sir, save by love. I am interested in your
honor and happiness as a daughter. Any further steps taken in this
affair will be only to gratify the vengeance of Cleverling. He thinks
not of the king's honor half so much as of his own selfishness! The
town is now almost in arms, sir, at the attack made by him to-night
upon the private house of a citizen; and I doubt not but that deep
retribution would have followed ere this, if they had not thought the
soldiers had been sufficiently punished already by this young man's
gigantic brother!
Tell me what I shall do, then? asked the governor, perplexed,
between his personal fears and his desire to keep the good will of
the ministry, whose policy he saw was despotic and hostile to the
colonists. If I pass this by, I shall be accused by the ministry of
weakness; for the passage of the Stamp-Act clearly shows me, and
all the world, the temper they hold towards these people! I am not
the half so severe upon them as the king at home. What would you
have? The king hates them, and I must hate them! The ministry
oppresses, and I must oppress them! Parliament binds burdens
upon them, and I must put them on their backs, or lose my place!
Blame not me, but the king I serve!
Lucy made no reply. She looked sadly at Fleming, for she knew
that he, as well as she herself, saw beneath the wicked fallacy of this
defence. She knew that the guilt lay as much with her father as
with the power he professed to obey. Fleming now prepared to
go, when Lucy said quickly,
Do not return by the direct street, nor leave the house openly.
Cleverling is a dangerous man, and, for some deeper cause than
your resistance to him, he desires your ruin. Follow me, and I will
show you a safe way out.
I do not fear him, Miss Hutchinson. I am not a criminal, that I
should fly secretly! I will go openly as I came!
For
my
sake, Fleming, be discreet, she said, in a low,
impressive
tone. The words, and the kind looks which accompanied them,
made his heart bound with transport, and he knew not what wild
hopes.
For your sake I will be everything but false to my oppressed
country, he said, with enthusiasm.
Then follow me this way!
Fleming turned back to bid the lieutenant-governor good night,
ere he walked after her.
Then you are going, young man?
Yes, your excellency.
I warn you, then, not to meddle with this matter between the
king and the colony. Those who are discreet will by-and-bye be
the best off. Heads have fallen on the scaffold for a lesser matter
than this of thine! But for my daughter's sake I have overlooked
the crime. Take care of yourself henceforth!
Fleming then passed out into the hall, through the adjacent room,
preceded by Lucy, who had already opened the door, and was
waiting
for him. She led him to the piazza in the rear of the house, and
so down through the garden to a gate, which was locked on the
inner side. Here a sentinel was posted, who, at her command,
opened the way and suffered him to pass. He hastily pressed her
offered hand with grateful devotion, and the next moment was on
his way towards his own dwelling.
CHAPTER VI.
THE KING'S SHIP.
SEVERAL days after the events which have been detailed in the
last chapter, transpired, a group of persons were seen standing
upon Fort-Hill, then an open green eminence, intently gazing
down the harbor. Another and much larger group was upon Copps
Hill farther to the north, and the summit of the more central height
upon which was erected the Beacon, was literally black with a
multitude
;
while the piers and roofs of the houses were crowded with
spectators. The bells of the churches were tolling a funeral knell,
minute guns were firing from Long Wharf, and the flags of all the
vessels in the port were hoisted half-mast, as if some great and
universal
calamity had befallen the colony.
The object upon which the attention of these numerous spectators
was fixed, was a large ship that was slowly coming up the harbor
under her topsails and top-gallantsails. The wind was very light,
being scarcely strong enough to ripple the shadows of the islands
which were reflected upon the surface of the water.
The ship carried the English ensign, which, at intervals flashed its
red folds out to the view of the eyes of all the people. The same
proud flag floated from from the staff upon the roof of Governor
Hutchinson's mansion, which was near Fort Hill, and commanded
a view of the harbor. The faces of the persons composing the
group upon this eminence, were sad and stern. A fixed gravity had
settled upon their features that was singularly impressive. It
seemed
that one profound sentiment filled every mindone powerful
emotion swelled every bosom. Old men and young, matrons and
maidens, and even children, were alike grave. Silence and awe
rested like a cloud upon every one, accompanied by a painful air of
expectation, like some multitude that has fled to a place of
temporary
security from the convulsions of the earth, and now stand
waiting for the next appalling throe that shall shake the solid ground.
Now and then words were interchanged between those who were
nighest to one another, but they were articulated in a depressed
cadence
.
The ship which was thus the central object of all eyes, and whose
presence cast such an influence over the minds of the citizens of the
town was the Mentor from London, and contained the bales of
stamped paper ordered to supply Boston. She had been telegraphed
three hours before, and the intelligence of her arrival in the harbor's
mouth, spread like wildfire throughout the town. All pursuits were
abandoned, and men and women hastened to the nearest elevation
commanding a view of the sea, to gaze upon the approach of the
king's ship.
The interval which elapsed between the events narrated in the five
preceding chapters and the present time, had not passed without
excitement
.
The Governor, through the remonstrances of the
principal
citizens, had been wise enough to send the troops back to the
castle, after keeping them two days in the town: and this judicious
act contributed materially to mollify the public mind. The
inhabitants
seemed inclined to let matters remain for the present, without
pushing things to a crisis; and to wait until the stamps should be
sent over with the officers appointed to act under the new law. The
vessel had been daily looked for to bring them over, for a week prior
to her arrival. The people, however, remained quietly engaged in
their several occupations and, at the suggestion of the town-rulers,
bore themselves with submission to the Governor. He, on his part,
seemed inclined to pursue lenient measures; and even was thought
to be disposed to ingratiate himself with the chief towns-people.
The colony, however, had not been idly waiting for the stamps to
arrive
and for the law to go into operation. Committees of
correspondence
with the other colonies were organized, and they advised to
make a dignified resistance against the usurpations of Britain and
seek an honorable redress of their wrongs. Petitions at the same
time were drawn up, addressed to the crown, respectfully praying
that the stamp duty might not be finally imposed; for it would tend
to the ruin of the commerce of America, and destroy the best interests
of Great Britain. The reply of the English governors, when they
read these petitions, was that the colonial gentlemen lived like lords
upon their estates, or were becoming merchant princes by their
commerce
,
whilst the people of England were poor and oppressed with
taxes, to
support and protect them
.
Such was the state of public feeling, when the intelligence that the
ship containing the stamped paper, was in the lower harbor.
Slowly she came onward, laden with the fuel that kindled a flame,
which was only extinguished seventeen years afterwards, when the last
British soldier trod as a foeman, the American soil, and the last
hostile
ship of her humbled fleets, left her waters. Among the group upon
Fort-Hill, stood three men, who have already been made known to
the reader. These were William Lee, Fleming Field, and his
brother
Saul. They stood in front of the group of some thirty persons,
who were upon the eminence. They were gazing in silence, and
with thoughtful faces, upon the approaching ship. An air of
resolulution
and proud defiance was stamped upon the countenance of
Fleming
,
as if he sternly felt within himself, that the efforts of England to
enforce the stamp law upon the colonies, would be futile.
I am told by them as knows more nor I do, Master Fleming,
said an honest cobbler near him, a little bald man, in iron spectacles,
and a long leathern apron nearly hiding his body, as how if the
stamp paper goes into use, we'll have to pay a tax for every thing.
I heard Cummer Brown say, as how poor young folks couldn't get
married for the expense! Now that is what I call a mortal sin, as
well as a pity.
And I heard say, said a thin weaver; in a blue woollen cap and a
gray woollen long coat, that for every letter as is written, we must
write it on the king's stamped paper, and pay two-pence for it to the
Stamp Office.
Yes, neighbor, said the captain of a coasting sloop, and what
is more, for every bill of ladin, every ship's paper, we must pay to the
king's officer, a stamp duty of at least ten shillings.
But suppose we don't choose to write on stamp paper?
ventured
the cobbler. We could come the lap-stone over the king,
that a-way.
No instrument of any kind, no deed, no will, no bond, no simple
note of hand, said warmly, a lawyer near by; no marriage contract,
no bill of lading, no warrant of any sort, no writ whatsoever, no
commission
,
no instrument of conveyance, no bail bond, no grant or title,
no mortgage or release, no demurrer, no contract will be legal, unless
written and drawn upon the king's stamped paper.
Yes, said a portly inn-keeper, and every pack of cards is to
bear a stamp duty of a shilling, and every pair of dice ten shillings.
Every pamphlet and printed sheet of any kind, is also to be
stamped more or less, said a publisher of a journal, with an
indignant
glow upon his brow; and what is more, upon
every
advertisement
in the stamped gazette, is to be levied a stamp duty of ten
shillings. Not even the almanacs escape the lynx-eyed ministry.
Two-pence the king puts into his pocket, for every one sold.
Methinks the king's majesty maun ha'a long pooch too hold all the
siller, observed a Scotchman, who had been the sexton of the old
South a score of years.
Yes, the king 'll get rich out o' the colonies, said the weaver.
Its no better than coining our flesh and blood into gold for him,
this stamp act!
I'd give a silver sixpence, enny how, to get a sight o' the stamp
itself, observed the cobbler.
The stamp, mon, answered the sexton; its na much ye'd see
I ken. The stamp is put on the paper over in London, by the kang's
secretary, and the paper is sent o'er to us for each mon to buy o' his
stamp officer, when he wants to mak' use on't.
And its done in red ink! an ominous color, that the king may
take warning at! said William Lee, stoutly. We shall give the
king's soldiers leaden stamps in blood, if he tries to make us submit
to this tyranny of his.
Then its the stamped paper, an' no' the stamps themselves, as is
in the ship a comin' so gallant up the harbor, said the cobbler.
Yes, answered William Lee. The telegraph says that the
ship is the Mentor, which we knew by the last vessel that arrived,
was to bring out the stamped paper. It comes in bales, and probably
yonder ship contains paper enough to return to the king's coffers, if
we are slaves enough to purchase and pay the duty, fifty thousand
pounds. Doubtless too, the ship brings over the stamp officers.
If they land, let's hang em, cried Saul, the gigantic idiot, who
had got into his brain, some general idea of the grievance men
complained
of; let us hang 'em right up without prayers.
The words of the natural were caught up by the cobbler, the
weaver, and two or three others, and the cry of down with the stamp
officers! began to break upon the still air of the afternoon, when
Fleming spoke.
My friends, peace! Let us be temperate. Nothing good can
come of violence. The colony is prepared for this day, and for the
emergency. Be assured, the officers of the stamp will not enter upon
the duties of their office. Believe that not a colonist will pay a
farthing for stamp paper. This is the sentiment we have all
embraced
.
Let this suffice. There is no need of high voices or open acts
of violence. There is a more effectual resistance.
Master Fleming speaks well, cried two or three voices. We
will be quiet, and let things take their course. We will soon see how
it ends, and what comes of the king's law.
Till then, patience, good friends, said Fleming. The ship has
caught a fresher breeze, and comes gaily on, William, he added to
his friend. I hope the people will be calm, and let the officers and
paper be landed. Once on shore, they are both under our control.
If I had my way, Fleming, answered the shipwright, a cloud of
dark displeasure passing across his brow, I would take two hundred
good men with me, board the ship ere she got to her anchor, and
pitch into the harbor every bale of the accursed stamp paper, and
the stamp officers after them.
This would be a mad course, Lee, responded Fleming. It
would, instead of the tax, bring upon us a civil war. We must not
resist but with dignity and firmness. In refusing submission to this
yoke, imposed upon us by England, we must not forget the respect
we owe to ourselves.
You speak always like a wise man. I act from impulse. You
always prove to be right in the end, while I go wrong, answered Lee.
It is your wisdom as well as your courage, which has made you so
popular among the town's people, aye and even through the whole
colony. The members of the General Court talk with you, and
listen
to your words; and every young man looks upon you as an idol.
I do believe, that if you were to say the word, they would rise to a
man, lock Hutchinson up in the castle a prisoner, and make you,
young as you are, governor in his stead. I hear your praise in all
men's mouths. When the mob, two weeks ago, would have sacked
his house, your single presence turned them aside and appeased their
fury. The fire-brand which I held in my hand, somehow or other,
you made me give up to you without a word; and when you stamped
it out, I shouted with the loudest my hurrah.
You give me undeserved praise, William, answered Fleming,
smiling at the other's earnest and kindly warmth of feeling. I have
but done what others in similar circumstances would have done
better
.
The ship is furling her sails to come to an anchor. I am glad
to see that the people remain such quiet spectators. They are
resolved
to comply with the earnest request of the committee of safety,
and leave events to its more legitimate guidance.
Is it true that all the lawyers, notaries, and attorneys, resolved at
a meeting last night, not to make use of any stamp paper? asked
Lee.
Yes; and the commttee of safety, as well as the general court,
have pledged themselves to uphold and sustain them, and every man
who refuses to make use of it.
But suppose a captain should want to clear his vessel after the
act goes in force, which will be in five days from this, the first of
November
;
he must have it made out on stamped paper, and pay the
stamp duty for it, else if any English man-of-war falls in with him, he
will be declared a pirate; for England, you see, won't recognise any
ship's papers as lawful, unless they are made out on stamped paper.
Now what shall an honest captain do? He can't stay in port, and if
he goes to sea without stamped papers, he is liable to lose his vessel?
It is better he should not go to sea, than in a single instance
acknowledge
the right of Parliament to impose the duty, by submitting
to pay it. If he is a true patriot, he will let his vessel rot in the dock,
before he goes to sea carrying upon his papers the stamp of vassalage.
But this matter will be arranged between the committee of safety and
the governor. He will, probably, find it expedient to grant to such
captains exemption papers, which will secure them from capture.
Hutchinson will not do this, answered Lee firmly.
We do not know what he will do, until the hour of trial arrives.
This will be soon; for within five days this new act becomes a
law over all the colonies, from Boston to Savannah, answered Lee.
The ship has dropped her anchor, and is furling her topsails. To
tell you the truth, Fleming, I would rather she had not been suffered
to enter the harbor. I consider the very mud at the bottom of it
tainted
by the touch of her anchor. A ship that bears in her bosom the
chains sent to bind us, should never have found the American soil,
even though ten fathom of salt water flows above it. But patience,
as you say, and we shall see the end of it.
A deep murmur now passed through the throngs upon the
eminences
of the town, as a boat shot out from the side of the anchored ship,
and pulled in towards Long Wharf.
That boat brings, doubtless, an officer to wait on the governor,
and tell him our chains are ready, said the impetuous Lee. Did you
notice the ship fired no gun coming up the harbor, as they usually do.
They knew they were bringing what would not be well received.
Perhaps they thought the minnit guns firin' on the wharf, enough
burnin o' powder; said the little cobbler. Well, let 'em come.
Neighbors, suppose we take a run down the hill, and so past the
Battery
,
to State street, and see the landin' o' the stamp officer-man.
Is he like a lion, and has he a mane, and can he roar as well as
stamp, Flemmy? asked Saul.
Bless you, honest idiot, answered the weaver, looking up at the
face of Saul as a man looks up into a poplar, its no a monster-beast,
this stamp, with feet to stamp on a body with, ony a seal like to put
on paper. Ye need not be afeared o' it, man.
An it was a lion I'd no fear it, answered Saul, brandishing his
bat-stick; and then taking his leathern ball from his pocket, he tossed
it high in the air. As it descended, he hit it a strong blow, and sent
it a hundred yards down the hill. It was pursued by a troop of boys,
and also by Saul himself, whose only companion it was, as this
pastime
was his sole occupation. For hours he would play upon the
Common
with the school-boys, and seemed only happy when engaged in
this his favorite amusement. His skill was so great, that he could strike
the vane upon the old South with it, scarcely missing once in a
hundred
times. His bat afforded him also a formidable weapon, being
nearly as large and heavy as a capstan-bar. The service he had
done with it on the night of Cleverling's visit to his dwelling, had been
passed over by the governor, who had discretion enough to see that
any steps taken to arrest him would be unsafe, as Saul was a
town-favorite
,
and his cause every man would make his own.
The most of the group followed the cobbler and weaver down the
hill; and at the same time a movement of the masses upon the two
other eminences took place, and they also began to flow towards the
heart of the town, to witness the passage through the streets of the
person who had come on shore in the boat. The side-walks were
soon filled with gazing citizens. The shops and stores were
already
closed, and from many of the windows of the houses were hung
black scarfs. The bells continued to toll their funeral peals, and at
solemn intervals, the heavy boom of the minute gun shook the town.
Across State street, as the officers, for there were three in number,
ascended it, through the lines of people, suddenly appeared before
them banners strung from window to window, bearing the following
mottoes:
Liberty and Property Forever
!
No Stamp
!
There was no cry made. Not a word escaped the silent throngs,
as the officers passed along towards the residence of the governor.
They seemed to be amazed at what they witnessed around them, and
walked on pale but firmly, escorted by the governor's private
secretary
,
a young man who every one esteemed, and perhaps out of respect
to whom they forbore uttering aloud their contempt and resentment.
Governor Hutchinson met them at the door of his house, and
received
them warmly in the presence of hundreds who had followed them
to the front of the mansion.
You have turned out the whole town to honor our landing, it
would seem, said the British officer.
They have done it voluntarily, I assure you, gentlemen,
answered
the governor, in a tone of mingled fear and malice, as his eye
glanced upon the gazing multitude. You have done well to reach
me in safety. I am sorry you did not come over in a frigate. One
anchored off the wharves would give me the whole place by the ear.
They seem to be very much excited, answered the British
officer
,
though they spoke only through their placards. Do you think
they will be so mad as to refuse submission to the law after it goes into
force, on the first?
They are obstinate enough to do any thing! I am little better
than a prisoner in a besieged place.
I would raise the siege soon, if I were the king's governor here,
answered the officer haughtily.
I have tried every measure. Nothing will do but to send some
score of the chief men to England, and hang them there. You have
brought the stamped paper?
Yes, your excellency. I have come to report to you its arrival,
and to know when and where I shall land it.
That I will tell you by-and-bye, answered Hutchinson, as they
passed into the central hall of the house, and disappeared from the
view of those without.
Fleming and William Lee had not left the hill with those who went
to see the debarking of the king's officers. After remaining looking
at them as they walked up Long Wharf, until the buildings concealed
them, they conversed together a few moments in an earnest manner,
and then grasping hands, separated; Lee to go towards the docks,
and Fleming to proceed by way of Milk street, in the direction of his
own abode.
CHAPTER VII.
THE DEFEAT.
THE young artisan, to avoid the crowd which thronged the
streets in the vicinity of the governor's residence, took a
devious
route, passing in the rear of the mansion, and past the gate
of the garden by which Lucy Hutchinson had let him out. As he
came near the gate, a loud shout rose upon the air from the people
in front of the mansion. It was occasioned by the disappearance of
the officers within, the closing of the door, and the appearance of a
soldier with a musket to stand sentry upon the steps.
The shout caused Fleming to linger and listen, for his fears were
instantly aroused for the safety of the high-born maiden, whom he
loved with all the ardor of his being. Since their parting at that
very gate, four weeks before, he had met her frequently, and their
meetings had served to bind together, in pure and elevated love, two
noble hearts, which heaven had formed to be mated, though fortune
had cast their lots widely apart. But love knows no aristocracy.
Lucy Hutchinson's gratitude had first been awakened towards the
preserver of her life, and gratitude is the parent of a tenderer
emotion
.
She had not ceased to feel a deep interest in the young
stranger, to whom she owed so much, and when she learned that he
was a young artisan, her interest, if possible, was increased, and
perhaps was stronger than it would have been had the handsome
and courageous young man been of her own rank in society. His
bold and fearless bearing in the presence of her father, his generous
patriotism, added a sentiment of admiration to her deep gratitude; and
the union of these two emotions produced a feeling towards him that
paved the way for that surrender of the heart which subsequently
followed. The passion which Fleming entertained for her was
modest, as became his condition, but it was open and elevated, like
his own frank character. He loved her, he knew that he loved her
as he could love no other, yet the sense of his own lowly state did
not lead him to shrink from indulging the high hopes which at times
swelled his bosom. He was not presumptuous, but her gentle
kindness
,
her manifest interest in him, caused him to cherish hopes that
otherwise, he felt, would have been madness. They were like each
other in character, and it was natural that they should assimilate.
He felt grateful for her regard for him, and returned it with a passion
pure and adoring. His romantic love won the noble-hearted maiden's
heart, and she frankly surrendered it. Thus they were secretly
lovers, and mutually happy in their interchange of hearts. To
Fleming it seemed a transporting dream. He could hardly realise
that his aspiring love for the noble maiden was met with a return.
He wondered that when he dared to unfold to her ear the secret of
his passion, she had not haughtily forbade him her presence.
Sometimes they met by moonlight in the garden, and walking the
shadowy avenues discoursed together, now of the state of the
colonies, now of England and her glory, but mostly of love. He
had recounted to her all his heart's history, and she had given him
her own. Thus mutual knowledge of each other bound them closer
together, and made them both friends and lovers, for the holy dignity
of friendship does not always walk side by side with human love.
He loved to speak to her of his sister, and at her request he
brought Mary one evening with him to the gardens, and made them
known to each other. The maidens at once became interested in
each other, and so Mary, loving and beloved by both, became, as it
were, a new link to bind the lovers together.
Though Miss Hutchinson was highly educated, yet in no instance
did the artisan or his lovely sister betray that they were of humbler
condition than herself. Nature had given them beauty of feature
and nobleness of person; and natural intelligence had availed itself
of all the resources of education then furnished in the colonies to all
classes, and such resources were far from being inconsiderable. In
all that goes to elevate the intellect, inform the judgment, and
instruct
and purify the heart, the brother and sister were the equals of
the governor's daughter. The graces of painting and of embroidery,
the accomplishment of the guitar and harp, Mary Field had not; yet
Lucy thought her no less lovely in mind and person, and missed
them not in the sweet purity of her character, the beautiful
expression
of her soul-full eyes, the music of her loving voice, and the
artless
mirthfulness of her disposition. The two maidens became
friends. If Lucy had not loved Mary for her own sake, she would
have loved her for Fleming's.
Once or twice Lucy had paid a visit to the house with Mary, and
was charmed with the neat simplicity of all that she beheld. Pure
taste and native refinement of mind had placed their delicate seal
upon every article in the little parlor. The influence which Lucy
exercised over Fleming, though unconscious to herself, was very
great. He seemed to take a new and higher tone of feeling and
sentiment from the reflection of her love. He seemed to wish to
make himself in all his acts worthy of the rich treasure of her love.
Whenever he mingled among his town's-people, men marked a
certain
dignity in his air, and grace of bearing, that involuntarily drew
their attention and commanded their respect. When he spoke, as
he as well as other young men did, to the assembled citizens in the
numerous caucuses held for discussing the question of resistance or
submission to the stamp-act, he seemed to be endowed with a
power of eloquence unknown among them. He swayed and moved
them at his will, and yet unconsciously to himself, as it seemed. He
was listened to by the wise and the venerable, and his sentiments
were afterwards repeated as well in the hall of the rich colonist as
in the stall of the cobbler. All men commended him, and his name
was spoken with praise and high hopes by every tongue. He bore
with modesty all this popularity among his fellow-citizens, rejoicing
in his influence only so far as it bore upon the public good. Lucy
Hutchinson could not but hear of his praises, and she felt that when
she gave her heart to the young artisan, she had not misled her
judgment
that
he was worthy of a richer gift far than that she had
bestowed.
He was now about to enter the gate, before which he stood under
the impulse of apprehension lest the governor's daughter should be
alarmed by the shouts of the crowd, anxious also to know the cause
of it, when he heard a footstep within the garden rapidly
approaching
the gate. It was a man's step, and the rattling of the chains of
a scabbard told him that he was a British officer. He drew back
behind an oak that grew a few feet from the gate to observe who
should pass out, as he did not desire to be seen by any one, lest his
presence there might be construed into some hostile purpose against
the governor; for he had already got the name among the English
officers as a leader of the insurgents.
The gate opened, and Cleverling came out. He cautiously looked
around, as if not wishing to be observed, and then crossed the street,
and passed forward, muttering,
The way is clear. All the town is on the other side of the
house, and I am likely to have the field to myself! That monster
too is there with his infernal bat and ball! So to love and beauty I
steal my way!
These words had not been quite distinct to Fleming's ear. He
heard, however, enough to show him that the man was bent on some
evil design. His sister Mary instantly occurred to his thoughts, and
he resolved to follow him. Since the time he had been thrown from
the house by Saul, Cleverling had been at the castle, save within a
day or two past, when he was staying in town on leave. During
this period he had once been seen by Mary passing the court and
looking up it with attention. She turned pale when she saw him,
but did not mention the fact to her brother. Fleming had supposed
that he had ceased to think of her. But as he now took the way in
the direction of his house, he resolved to see that no mischief came
of it.
Cleverling did not look around, but rapidly walked on. At the
corner of the first street he was met and passed by the governor's
secretary, who was coming from the opposite direction. Cleverling
haughtily bowed, and after going by him, turned and said,
Landreth, if you hear the governor or my colonel inquire for
me, say I shall be back by sun-down. I am going to Cambridge.
With these words he passed on. The next moment Fleming met
the secretary. They grasped hands like two brothers.
What did Cleverling say to you? asked Fleming.
To say that he goes to Cambridge, and will be back by sun-down,
answered the young secretary, George Landreth, a pale, but
intellectual
looking young man, with a remarkably fine eye and mouth,
and an appearance strikingly elegant.
Have you just seen Mary?
Yes. She was at the governor's with Miss Hutchinson when
the ship was coming in, and I have just escorted her home, replied
Landreth, slightly blushing.
Is she alone?
Yes. Your mother has not come in.
I wish you to return at once and see where Cleverling goes.
Hear those cries and shouts! I hope the citizens will not forget
themselves! I have my suspicions of the man. I do not wish to
wound your feelings, George, but Cleverling has conceived a free
liking for Mary, and has once been hurled from the house by Saul
for following her home from church. Now that she is your betrothed
bride, you are equally her protector with myself. Follow him, and
see that he does not go to alarm her with his presence. I was
following
him, but you will protect her quite as efficiently as I could
do. I wish to go back and speak with Miss Hutchinson, and if
possible obtain speech with her father, for a crisis is approaching.
Do you hear those shouts? I must be there and do what I can to
arrest violence, if it is likely to break forth. To you I entrust the
sacred trust to protect Mary!
With these words Fleming pressed his friend's hand, and hastened
back towards the governor's mansion, from the front of which every
few moments loud and menacing shouts arose.
George Landreth's eyes flashed fire at the intelligence which
Fleming had conveyed to him touching Cleverling. He had never
suspected this, though he well knew the libertinism of his character,
and had little fellowship with him; for a pure man instinctively
shrinks from the companionship of the licentious, while they repay
his aversion by hatred and contempt. It is thus the evil and the
good are separated one from the other in this world, and it is thus
they will be in the next.
Character
is the great gulf fixed that
divides hell from heaven!
When Fleming left him, Landreth hastened with rapid steps after
the officer. He soon came in sight of him, and kept him in view
until he saw him turn up the court, when he became satisfied of the
evil of his intentions. The streets in that part of the town were
quite deserted, the lover and the libertine being the only two in them.
When Landreth reached the entrance to the court, Cleverling was
not to be seen. Satisfied that he had boldly entered the house, he
hastened up the court, and, leaping the fence, opened the door. As
he did so a wild shriek reached his ears from a distant part of the
house. He passed into the front room. A military glove lay upon
the floor. A chair was overturned. The door on the opposite side,
leading to a small breakfast-room, was thrown open. He rushed
into this apartment and across it through another wide open door
leading through the kitchen into the yard. The outer door was
closed, but opening it, he found himself in a small court-yard, which
was bounded on one side by a narrow lane. As he came in sight of
the lane, a carriage was driving along it at full speed, in the
direction
of the west part of the town. He pursued it with the fleetness
of a deer, for he knew that it contained Mary and Cleverling. An
obstruction in the way for a moment detained the carriage.
Cleverling
,
looking out to see what it was, beheld Landreth in pursuit.
Before the coach could proceed, George was at its side. He sprung
at the door and wrested it open. Cleverling, taken by surprise, was
5
hurled by the collar to the ground. Mary was on the forward seat,
with a deep woollen
cap drawn over her face and mouth. Landreth
called her by name, and removing it, clasped her to his heart.
Release that young woman, sirrah! cried Cleverling, in a fury
of madness at this interruption of his well-planned flight with the
lovely colonist.
Villain! cried the indignant lover, springing out, armed with
Cleverling's own sword, which had been left upon the carriage-seat,
defend yourself! I am the protector and avenger of this maiden!
She is my mistress, fellow! release her!
Foul liar! cried Landreth, striking him across the mouth with
the flat of the sword. Were it not for her presence, I would
punish
you with death upon the spot. Go, sir, and thank me for your
life.
You shall answer for this with your own, responded Cleverling,
black with rage. Give me up my sword.
One so base is unworthy to wear one, responded Landreth, as
he broke it in two with his foot, and cast to him the fragments.
Cleverling would have sprung upon him if he had dared; but his
eye quailed before the steady determination of that of the young
secretary. He took up the pieces of his sword and was about to
walk away, when he seemed to recollect the carriage, which was one
of those one horse chariots, then in vogue, and usually driven by a
negro
.
A black lad was now upon the seat trembling with affright.
The carriage shall convey Miss Field back to her house,
answered
Landreth. Then it is at your service.
Cleverling bit his lip with rage and vexation. He looked as if he
half resolved to make an attempt to rescue his lost prize, but
discretion
got the better of his wishes. He remained standing where
Landreth
left him until he saw the carriage stop in the rear of the house
from which he had forcibly borne the lovely colonist, and Landreth
take her from it and convey her almost fainting with the alarm she
had undergone, into the dwelling. The chariot then returned to
where he stood, when getting into it he drove rapidly away.
God must have sent you to my rescue, dear Landreth, said
Mary
,
after she was sufficiently recovered to be able to converse and
express her gratitude.
I was going home when I met this unprincipled Cleverling, and
soon afterwards your brother Fleming. He told me he suspected
him to be coming here, and desired me to watch him, as his presence
he felt, was needed at the governor's. He amazed me by telling me
that Cleverling ever knew you at all.
I never saw him, save when he followed me from church, and
once or twice since, when he has been here with the soldiers, or
passed
by at the foot of the lane. I have always feared him.
How is it that he was able to get you into the carriage so soon
from the house?
I was in the garden looking at a chariot which I heard entering
the lane, little suspecting its purpose, when I heard a step in the
house. The next moment Mr. Cleverling appeared, and running
towards
me, caught me up in his arms. I shriked, when he stopped
my mouth with his hand, and bore me swiftly to the carriage. He
placed me in, drawing, at the same time, a cap over my face, and
getting in after me, bade the driver to proceed nor spare his horse. I
used every exertion to escape from the carriage, when he
threatened
me with instant death unless I was still. This menace caused me
to make stronger exertions, hoping he would indeed kill me. At this
instant, you came up, and I am saved.
Cleverling shall answer for this with his life, said Landreth,
sternly, as he rose and walked the room. Be composed, dearest
Mary. He shall be rewarded to the top bent of his iniquity.
Do not take any vengeance upon him, George, cried the maiden
with alarm. You will only endanger your own life, and also make
public what you had best suffer to pass in silence.
There is wisdom in your words. The busy tongue of slander
may make more of it than it is if it gets abroad. I will let it pass,
unless he crosses my path. But here is Saul. I would he had been
here a quarter of an hour earlier, and you would have been safe.
Mr. Cleverling told me in the carriage when I called on their
names, that he knew my brothers were both absent, and said that I
was beyond reach of all succor. But for your providential presence, I
should have been.
Well, Saul, I am glad to see you, said Landreth. Come with
me to the door, I have a word to say to you.
I ha' been up to the goveny's, Georgy. I never see so many
people
afore in my life. How they did holler! I didn't get to see the
stamp though. I guess they keeps him in a cage. If I see him I'd
grapple him, wouldn't I. I'd kill him as quick as I would a kitten.
Never mind the stamp, Saul, said Landreth, taking him by the
hand and leading him to the gate. I have something for you to
do.
Well, I'll do it for you, Georgy, answered Saul, laying his huge
hand kindly on the young man's shoulder.
You know Lieutenant Cleverling!
The red coat and gold on it. I know him and he knows Saul,
replied the giant, with a fierce look, at the same time grasping his
bat-stick.
He has been here a second time, and tried to carry off your
sister
,
who is to be my bride. Listen, Saul, and don't be too hasty.
You must act like a wise as well as a brave man. He did not
succeed
,
though he got her into a carriage; but I rescued her, and she
is, you see, in the room.
I'll kill him. I told him I'd kill him, cried Saul, fiercely.
No, you must not kill him, Saul. Do what I wish and you will
punish him better than killing him. Besides, if you kill him you will
be hanged.
I don't care, I'll kill him.
Saul, you must listen to me, said Landreth, firmly. If you
would do your sister a service, follow my directions. I have not
told Fleming of it, as I wish to give you an opportunity that I know
will please you.
Well, let me hear, Georgy.
Cleverling is staying at the house of Mr. Oliver, He will
probably
be there to-night, as it is too late for him to get over to the
castle
,
it being now within a few minutes of sun-down. You must watch
for him as soon as it is night, and get possession of his person. You
know you can carry him where you list, as if he were a child.
I know it, Georgy.
He
knows it too, answered Saul, almost
savagely, and with a look of triumph, as if proud of his enormous
strength and huge stature.
When you get possession of him, take him to the old wind-mill
on the point at the back of the Beacon hill, and there detain him
until
I come. See that you do not harm him though.
I'll do it, Georgy. But, Georgy, if he an't at Mr. Olivey's, shall
I take a boat and paddle down to the castle after him?
No, we must wait till he comes again to the city. But I do not
think he will leave town, as he has a week's leave, and has been up
but two days. You must be wary and not let him see you and
suspect
you, for he already fears you.
Yes, I gave him cause to, Georgy, I did. I will not let him know
I want him. The dog! to try to hurt litty Menny. Here's brothy
Flemmy. Don't you tell him, Georgy, or he won't let me go.
I won't, perhaps, mention it to him, answered Landreth, as
Fleming came up.
Where are you going, Saul? asked Fleming, as his brother
moved
rapidly away as if he did not wish to be questioned by him.
Saul pretended not to hear.
I have sent him on an errand of my own, answered Landreth.
But you looked flushed. What has occurred?
How is it about Cleverling? asked Fleming, quickly. Was he
here?
He came and
And what? Why do you hesitate, George?
Then I will tell you all, if you promise me that you will leave him
to me.
Has he been insulting Mary, then? cried Fleming with a
flashing
eye.
Promise to leave him in my hands, and you shall hear what has
occurred, answered Landreth, who at last thought it best to tell
him.
I promise then.
Come in and you shall hear, said Landreth; and they entered
together the little parlor where Mary sat in tears, which she strove to
brush away and to smile as she saw her brother.
CHAPTER VIII.
THE MOB.
TEARS, my dearest sister! cried Fleming, regarding her
pale face with surprise and concern, the roseate reflection
from the sun-set sky falling upon it, scarcely overcoming its
deathly hue.
It is nothing, Fleming! she said, striving to look cheerful.
I have thought it best to tell Fleming all, said Landreth.
For God's sake, let me hear all! he cried with emotion.
Landreth then proceeded to relate what had passed. Fleming
listened
with a dark frown upon his brow, and firmly compressed lips.
He did not utter a word, until Landreth had ended. He then
remained
silent a moment, crossed the room, and affectionately kissed his
sister, and then grasped George Landreth's hand.
Thanks, George, thanks! a brother's gratitude for what you have
done. But you have your own reward. Good evening. I shall not
return till lateperhaps not till morning. Remain here and leave
her not. With these words he rushed from the room.
George laid his hand upon his arm as he was going out of the court
door.
Fleming, where do you go?
To seek the villain Cleverling. I saw him not ten minutes
before
I came home, getting out of a carriage at Mr. Oliver's. Little
did I guess for what purpose he had called it into his service. I
hastened
home, not suspecting that he had been here, when I saw him in
the carriage, yet anxious to learn if he had, and also to tell Mary I
should be out to-night; for there is intense excitement in the town
about the arrival of the stamped paper.
You must not seek Cleverling, Fleming. You promised me that
you would leave him in my hands.
A brother alone should punish him.
Leave him with me. You have higher duties to call you to
action
.
If the towns-people are excited, your influence and presence
will go far to prevent any outbreak.
What will you do. You must not call him out, George! He
is a villain, and your life is to valuable to be pitted against his.
I do not intend to call him out openly, because I do not wish
the affair made public, for Mary's sake. He, of course, will keep
silent.
I thank you for this consideration for her. But he must not go
unpunished.
He shall not. When next we meet, I shall be able to assure
you, I trust, that he has been dealt with as he merits.
What do you mean to do?
I have a plan in which Saul is to be my agent. To-morrow I
will let you know the result.
I trust to you wholly, George. Stay now and protect my sister.
You will not be needed at the governor's. I have been there and
seen Lucy. She tells me her father, though intimidated, is in great
glee at the arrival of the stamped paper, and intends to-morrow to
appoint his officers. One of them is certainly to be Mr. Oliver, who
is now with him. He resolves, I am sorry to say, to carry the law
into effect, notwithstanding the hostile demonstrations of the people
against it. He appears to me infatuated. He is, however,
encouraged
by the officers who came in the ship, and by private letters from
Bute, Chatham, and Grenville, which Lucy heard him read aloud,
telling him to be firm in enforcing the law, and assuring him of being
sustained by the authorities at home. So his madness is sealed, and
I fear, his own fate.
I have, in my capacity as his private secretary, tried to show him
the impossibility of carrying the law into effect. But he would not
listen, or listening, only speak with contempt of any successful
resistance
of the people, declaring that the first man who made resistance,
should be arrested as a traitor, and sent to England for trial.
For his lovely daughter's sake, I pity him! said Fleming.
She challenges all our sympathy, answered Landreth, with
feeling.
She is keenly alive to her father's weaknesses, and I may say
wickednesses, said Fleming, while all her heart is with the
colonies
.
She ought not to suffer with him; yet she must, as a daughter,
feel all her father's misfortunes.'
Do you apprehend any evil will befall him from the violence of
the people?
I cannot tell. I shall do all in my power to prevent it. The
only course we have to pursue, is to send a remonstrance to the crown
against the act, and petition its repeal. This is the sentiment of the
judicious and reflecting. But the majority of the people are too
impatient
for such slow measures. They reflect but little, and act
impulsively
.
They feel the wrong as present, and wish to right
themselves
upon the instant. Instead of applying for redress to the
fountain
of the wrong, the crown, and waiting the result, they are
prepared
to visit with vengeance, the agents of the wickedness. When I left
the governor's a little while since, where I went to see Lucy, and
advise
her not to be alarmed at the concourse of people, and also to try
and obtain an interview with the governor, and prevail upon him to
send word to the committee of safety, that he would not for the
present
land the stamp paper.
Did you see him.
No. Lucy advised me not to then, as he would be sustained in
his despotic intentions by the presence of the officers of the crown. I
fear the most painful consequences will follow the landing of the
paper
.
I shall endeavor to see him this evening, through Lucy's
agency
.
But what course do you intend to take to avenge Mary's wrong?
I have seen Saul, and told him what Cleverling has been guilty
of. I stated the whole affair to him clearly, and his strong affection
for her made him comprehend the wrong, and at the same time
aroused his feelings. I then told him where he would probably find
Cleverling, and instructed him to get possession of his person in any
way he could, whether in the house or street, and bear him off under
cover of the darkness, to the ruined Mill on the shore, west of the
Beacon Hill.
This is a strange proceeding, George! What do you intend to
do with him at the Mill?
To make him fight me in single combat, and with his life atone
for the insult he has offered to Mary. There can be no objection to
this private proceeding.
But he may slay you, Landreth!
No. Our combat shall be with swords. We are both masters
of the weapon; but I have on my side something to fight for, while he
with have nothing but his miserable life. Say not a word, Fleming,
you know I am as resolved as you are when I purpose.
I will say nothing. God above will prosper the right. But if he
is slain by you.
The cause of his death will remain an impenetrable mystery.
But I shall not try to kill him. He is vain of his personof his fine
walk, and his elegance in dancing. I shall punish him enough by
aiming to humble his vanity. I would not have his death on my
hands, though he richly merits death.
The punishment you design for him, will be severer even than
death, if you are the victor.
Believe me, I shall be.
Be careful of yourself, George, for your life is dear to one whom
we both love.
The two friends then parted. Fleming hastened towards the
State-house, where he heard the confused sounds of voices like the
first mutterings of a storm; and the lover returning into the lowly
dwelling of the maiden to whom he had committed his heart's
keeping
.
When Fleming entered Cornhill, he saw a dense mass of people
about the State-house, a short distance up the street. He heard loud
shouts break upon the air, and torches were brandished, casting a
wild glare over the agitated mass. The twilight had not yet
deepened
into darkness, the rosy hues of the west still lingering in the
sky. The presence of torches so early therefore, indicated some
startling purpose on the part of those who bore them. He hastened
forward at first with a rapid walk, which he increased at a run as he
distinguished the cries of Down with Hutchinson! Down with
the Stamp-Officers!
What is the meaning of this, Thomas Crafts? he cried, as he
came up, laying his hand upon a man who carried a torch in his
hand.
Ah, Fleming, are you here? But you are too late. You had
best let us have our own way, answered the man kindly but firmly.
Too late for what?
You see we have got possession of the two cannon in front
there, and have driven the soldiers down King street to their
barracks
.
Not a red coat dares show his face.
Who instigated this? demanded Fleming, in a tone of mingled
grief and anger.
No man more than another. We are all leaders, unless you
The Mob.
choose to take the head. You are too moderate, by half, for a lover
of his country.
Fleming made no reply, but hastening forward, forced his way up
to the cannon, around which were gathered a score of men with
flaming torches. He sprung upon one of the guns and, taking off
his cap, waved his hand and called for attention. A hundred voices
shouted his name in tones of welcome, and silence prevailed
throughout
the vast and lately excited mob.
My friends, my brothers. What is this you do? Are you
consistent
when you call the king and ministry tyrants, and yet
yourselves
do deeds that would level you with them whom you detest.
Because they would make us slaves, shall we make ourselves rebels
and insurgents? Are we not the subjects of Great Britain? Are
we not loyal Englishmen at heart? If we are not, whose subjects
are we? To what nation do we belong? Have we, is any one of
you so bold as to say, thrown off all allegiance to law and order, and
made anarchy our king?
No, no! cried numerous voices.
We are the king's loyal people, answered a man near him; but
the king has forgotten his duty, and we would teach him that if we
are his subjects, we are also a free people.
Yet it is not freedom to make yourselves the servants of
misrule
,
replied Fleming in the same bold tone in which he had before
spoken. The king has done us a grievous wrong. We cannot
make him repair it by guilt. We should show him by our
forbearance
and by dignified remonstrances, that we are a people worthy
of his confidence and love; not confirm him in his opinion that we
are unworthy to hold the liberties which we inherited from our
fathers. The stamp act has been passed. It has become a law of
the land. The stamped paper has this day arrived in a king's ship,
and with it, two stamp officers. Now what is it you would do, for
no one of you will consent to use the stamp paper.
No, no! no stampno duties! cried the multitude as the voice
of one man.
This unanimous declaration is enough. Let the echo of your
voices reach the shores of England. Let it penetrate the palace of
St. James. Let every lord in the land hear it. Let it enter the
halls of Parliament in the shape of petitions for repeal and firm and
respectful remonstrances against the oppressive law. My word for
it, England will listen to it. The throne will heed it. The law will
be annihilated by the very hands that framed it, and we shall once
more be free. We have friends in England, warm, eloquent, influential
friends, who will become our advocates and plead our case. The
immortal Chatham is himself a host. His voice, already lifted in our
behalf, shall yet be listened to, and the law will be repealed. Trust
to this, my friends, and think not of taking the cause in your own
hands. I have heard your cry against the governor and against one
of our own townsmen, whom he is said to have named as a collector
of the stamp duty. These are not your game, and torches and stones
and shouts of opprobrium, not the weapons a free people should use.
Aim higher. Use nobler weapons. Let your eyes be fixed steadily
upon the throne itself, and the instruments you would use, petitions.
No petitions! No base praying to our oppressors. Manly
resistance
with fire and sword, if need be, cried Thomas Crafts, in a
stern tone.
This course will only bring ruin upon us. The king's armed
ships will fill our port, his armies overrun our streets. England is
too proud and powerful to be insulted. The conqueror of India,
the victor in a thousand wars, will not let idly pass forcible resistance
to her laws, whether we think them just or unjust.
What would you have us do? Tamely submit! asked Crafts,
with a frown, and looking about him with the dogged determination of
a man who feels that he is the voice-piece of the majority. In five
days the law will be in force. We must use paper; we must have
deeds, wills, bonds, marriage certificates, shipping papers, aye, we
must have cards and dice, and what is to be done? If we write on
paper not stamped nothing will be legal. If one man buys a single
sheet of stamped paper it will be confessing the right of the king to
put the duty.
Wait until the first of November comes, answered Fleming,
calmly. We shall then best see what steps to take. The governor
may find it expedient to take the responsibility of suspending the
operation of the law until our petitions and remonstrances reach
England.
He will never do this. If Governor Bernard were here he might,
but not the lieutenant governor! cried several voices.
Let us do nothing till the trial is made, my friends and
fellow-townsmen
,
said Fleming. For one, I have no doubt but he will
yield to the popular will, and suspend the operations of the law. But
this will depend much on your moderation. You have done wrong
to surround his house with menacing cries. You have done wrong
in taking possession of the cannon. Such steps only serve to widen
the difficulty. If you retire peaceably to your homes and wait the
issue, I am very sure that the governor will suspend the law.
Thomas Crafts and a few of the leaders of the mob conversed
apart a moment, and the former then addressed Fleming.
You speak, Master Fleming, of the governor's suspending the
operation
of the law. If he will do it on the first, he will promise us
to do it now. Will you wait on him in the name of all here present,
and put the question to him flat? We will escort you to the house
and wait outside for the answer.
Fleming hesitated how to reply. He saw the firm position the
people had taken; and he trembled for the result, if the governor
should refuse to make the promise. His situation he felt to be a
trying one. But trusting that he might prevail upon him to give
the promise, though he hoped against hope, he answered,
I will wait on the governor, but I will go unattended. You will
either remain here, or what is better, retire to your several homes.
The governor will not be menaced to it; and if he finds you are quiet
he may make the promise.
We want no favors of him, answered Crafts, loudly. Menace
or no menace, he must give the pledge! We will wait here for you,
Master Fleming, until the old South clock strikes seven. It is half an
hour to it now.
I will do the best I can, answered Fleming sadly, as he sprung
to the ground from the cannon; for he felt that he was going like one
sent on a forlorn hope.
The crowd made way for him to pass, and then most of them went
homeward to get their suppers ere he should return; while a few of
the most determined partisans seated themselves upon the
gun-carriages
and about the steps of the State-house. Many, of whom one
was Thomas Crafts, a wealthy blacksmith, were armed with clubs.
Crafts himself exhibited in a belt, a pistol and broad sword, which,
however, he kept covered in the presence of Fleming by his
overcoat
.
This man possessed a certain influence among his fellows;
and, employing some forty workmen in his shop, he had them now
about him ready to obey his will.
Fleming walked on in the direction of the governor's house,
deliberately
,
with no little anxiety of mind, upon the object of his mission.
With a clear judgment and uncommon foresight, he saw with regret,
what must be the ultimate issue of violent measures to obtain redress.
He thought he foresaw the vengeance of the crown resulting in the
ruin of the colonies, and the final extinction of those privileges which
they enjoyed above the subjects of the king at home; while he
believed
that mild measures would bring about a repeal of the act. He
also was solicitous for the happiness and safety of Lucy Hutchinson,
in case the vengeance of the mob should be visited upon her father.
Every motive of love and of patriotism prompted him to endeavor to
conciliate both parties and recommend on one side clemency, on the
other forbearance.
As he was passing Milk street, he was surprised to see a party of
men issuing from the door of a house which he knew to be the
residence
of William Lee. At first he supposed it to be some five or
six of his journeymen; but as they continued to march out four and
four, till full seventy men had passed into the street, he began to
suspect
some covert purpose; and when, as he walked near them, he
saw that every man's face was blackened, and that each bore some
weapon, he was convinced that William Lee meditated some secret
expedition. The last man that came forth was William Lee himself,
and he was the only one not disguised.
William, said Fleming, grasping the stout stick he carried;
where are you going with such a party?
Ah, Master Fleming, I would like to have gone without your
seeing
me; but you shall know. I have certain knowledge that
Hutchinson
has sent off for the stamped paper to be brought on shore
secretly
to-night under cover of the darkness. He intends to have it
stored in Oliver's new house at the foot of King street. That house
you see, he has been building for a stamp office, but not a king's stamp
ever goes into it.
What do you intend to do?
I will tell you frankly, Fleming, for I am resolved, and you
needn't say a word to move me. Peace and forbearance will do well
enough to talk about, but it won't answer in practice. I intend to take
the bales of stamped paper into my own keeping. If they don't
reach Hutchinson he isn't obliged to put the law into force; for no
stamped paper, no stamp law. This, you see, is taking the viper by
the tail and snapping his head off. It is laying the axe at the root.
It will save the governor a deal of trouble, and make all quiet. So
don't say a word, for as much as I love you I shan't listen to you.
That stamped paper shall never see the inside of Oliver's stamp
office
.
Fleming reflected a moment. He saw from Lee's determined
manner, that he could not dissuade him from his purpose; and it
occurred
to him, that if the paper could be arrested in its progress to
the stamp office and destroyed, it might for the time serve to mollify
the public excitement, although its ultimate consequences might fall
heavily upon the colony. But, he said mentally, in this dilemma
there seems no alternative. If the king sends troops to punish us,
we must resist with arms in our hands, and, if need be, sever our
allegiance
to the crown.
I have nothing to say, William, he added aloud; only take no
man's life. With this injunction he left him, and Lee led his men
towards the harbor.
CHAPTER IX.
THE OUTBREAK.
FLEMING, aware that he could not obtain an audience of the
governor by applying at the front gate, took his way around
the grounds to the entrance of the garden. He found this gate
closed and locked within; but having a key furnished by the hands
of the governor's daughter, he placed it in the wards. He was in
the act of opening the gate, when his attention was drawn by the
sound of a heavy tramping, like a horse moving over frozen ground.
As the object came nearer and evolved itself out of the darkness, he
beheld the gigantic figure, of his brother Saul. Thrown across, his
broad shoulders was hanging downward some large burden, as a
hunter
carries a deer that he has slain. As he passed close by the gate
at a heavy round trot, Fleming saw that it was a man suspended by
the heels across his back, head downwards. He did not need the
aid of a lantern to see who it was. He knew that it could be
Cleverling
and none other. Fleming did not speak or betray his presence.
He fell a stern delight in seeing the libertine in the hands of his
brother; nor could he help smiling at the ludicrousness of his
situation
.
Cleverling, however, beheld him, and raising up his face as well
as he could, he cried,
For the love of mercy, whoever you are, come to my aid and
rescue
me from this savage monster.
As he spoke, Saul gave him a blow with the flat of his hand upon
the cheek and bade him be silent. The next moment they were lost
in the obscurity of the distance, though the groans of the wretched
man and the heavy tramp of Saul's feet, as he took his way in the
direction of the old mill, were long heard.
There is just retribution. I pity the man, yet I would not rescue
him. He deserves this. I trust that the noble-minded Landreth will
meet with no harm from him. But Heaven will give victory on the
side of virtue.
He now entered the garden and traversed it to a terrace which
5
led round to the west side of the house, and gave access to a long
window that opened into the drawing-room. This window he had
passed through before under the guidance of Lucy. He threw it up
and entered the room. It was perfectly dark. He crossed it to a
door, through which gleamed a light. He went to it and softly opening
it, beheld Lucy writing at a table with an anxious countenance. He
entered, and catching the sound of his footstep she raised her eyes
and recognizing him with an exclamation of joy, rose and caught his
hand.
I am so glad you have come, Fleming, she said in a pleased
but low tone of voice; I was just writing a note to you.
I will read it now, he answered, smiling as he took it up from the
table.
No, I will tell you what I would have written.
But I will hear also, thus I shall have a two-fold pleasurethe
sweet sound of your voice and the silent music of your exquisite
hand-writing.
This is no time for flattery, dear Fleming.
I cannot flatter those I love. But what is it you would of me?
I tremble for my father. He has just received an anonymous
letter, threatening, if he brings the stamped paper into his house, that
not one stone shall be left upon another.
Did he intend to do so?
Yes, for safe keeping, by the advice of the three king's officers,
and also of Colonel Mortley.
But he has since changed his determination, for I but now learned
it was to be landed at the new store-house just built by Mr. Oliver,
in King street.
Then this threat has induced my father to alter his mind. I hope
it is so. These are indeed fearful times, Fleming. I wrote to you
to endeavor to turn aside the popular tide which sets so fiercely
towards
my misguided parent. I know your influence with your
fellow-townsmen
.
They will listen to you when they will hear no one
else. Go abroad and keep with them and among them. Let them
commit no rash acts. I tremble for my father's life.
His life will not be touched, though his house may be attacked.
Is this probable, Fleming? she asked, pale but firm.
Yes. The popular excitement is at a great height. There is
only one thing that will allay it. It remains with your father.
What is it that he should do? she asked with deep earnestness
in look and tone.
I am sent hither by full two thousand men, now assembled about
the head of King street awaiting me. They have possessed
themselves
of the two cannon placed there, and compelled the soldiers to
retire precipitately to their barracks where they have shut themselves
in, apprehending an attack upon it.
Oh, when will these troubles end. I sympathize with the brave
colon sts in their wrongs, yet I cannot but strongly condemn the course
they are pursuing to obtain redress.
It is to be censured by every true patriotby every discreet
colonist
,
answered Fleming. But the people now have the head and
nothing will stop them in their course but a change of policy on the part
of the licutenant governor. As I came hither I met sevently resolute
men, headed by one of the boldest spirits in the cause, who with
blackened faces and armed with clubs, were marching towards the
docks with the avowed purpose of seizing upon the stamped paper
as soon as it lands.
This is fearful news. It will lead to consequences dreadful to
contemplate.
We must do what we can to turn aside the evil. I am sent
hither
by a body of my townsmen to demand audience of the governor;
and ask him if he will give his promise that on the first of
November
the operation of the stamp-law shall be suspended until petitions
and remonstrances can be sent to the crown.
This is a moderate request, Fleming, and shows a better
disposition
on the part of the people than I hoped for. This is the only
proper course for them to take. My father cannot refuse this request,
as he knows that upon it hangs the safety and peace of the
commonwealth
.
I have come to ask him. Will you see if he will receive me?
The governor was standing by a window looking forth upon the
harbor
.
His eyes were particularly directed to two lights which shone
on the decks of the tax-ship, as the vessel which brought over the
stamps was called by the colonists. He was alone; the officers
having
left him, to superintend the debarkation of the stamped paper. He
was suddenly roused from his meditations, which were by no means
conciliatory towards the colonists, towards whom, if possible, he
entertained
hourly more vindictive feelings; for he had made the
differences
between them and the crown a personal and private feud, to
which he brought all the animosity of his nature.
Father, said Lucy, taking him by the hand, Mr. Fleming Field
is in the house and desires to see you.
I can hold no speech with him. I have to-day made up my mind.
I am satisfied that the crown will sustain me if I should set fire to this
insurgent town, and return to England in yonder ship.
Mr. Field is sent sir, by a body of two thousand of his
fellow-townsmen
,
who await his return at the head of King street. It is too
serious a mission, sir, for you to treat it lightly. Your dwelling may
your life, my dear father, is in danger.
What do they want of me?' he asked moodily.
Mr. Field will inform you, father, she answered, going to the
door, and ushering Fleming in.
Well, young man! So you are sent to speak with me by a mob
of insurgents.
I am sent to your excellency by a body of freemen and loyal
king's subjects,' answered Fleming respectfully and firmly.
I have heard of you, sir! Half the rebellious spirit in the town
is owing to you, sir! You are a leader among them. I don't know
but, now that you are here, that I ought to let you depart. It is my
duty to arrest you, and send you prisoner to England, charged with
treason.
Your excellency, I have done much to prevent open acts of
violence
in the town. My influence is small, but what I have, I have
exercised on the side of order. It is with the hope of preserving
peace, that I have consented to wait upon you, at the request of my
fellow-townsmen.
What do they demand?
They are willing to leave the issue to respectful remonstrance
and petition to the crown for a repeal of the law. They, therefore,
desire time to send to England, and to hear the answer of the king
and parliament to their prayers. They authorise me to say to your
excellency, that if you will promise that the law shall not go into
operation
on the first of November, but be suspended until we can hear
from England, that they will retire peaceably to their homes, and
return
each man to his occupation and craft.
This is modest, by the king's head. Very modest indeed! So
I am to suspend a law of the empire on my own responsibility.
But consider, your excellency, the circumstances! These will
be taken into consideration at home, in extenuation of your conduct.
The governor seemed to reflect. His daughter watched his
countenance
with the most painful solicitude. From her heart went up a
prayer that God might give her father wisdom.
And if I do not make this promise? asked the governor, fixing
his eyes upon Fleming's face.
I cannot answer either for the security of your house or your
person.
This is come to a pass. I must throw myself, I dare say, into the
castle, and upon the protection of the troops. I will do this at once;
so take back my answer to these rebels. Tell them the law shall go
into force on the first day of November, as decreed. I shall take no
responsibility. Come, my daughter, at once begin to get ready, for
I shall go down to the castle in the morning.
You have not five minutes, your excellency. A half an hour was
allotted me to deliver my errand and receive your reply, and convey
it back to the waiting multitude. I have no power to prevent any
course they may see fit to pursue, on learning your refusal to this just
and expedient request.
I shall not consent to it. They dare not attack me. They know
they would be hung, every dog of them.
Their minds are in that state, sir, that they care little for results to
themselves. They count their lives as nothing, compared with the
liberty which they inherit from their pilgrim-fathers.
Father, I entreat of your listen to the people! cried his daughter
with tears in her eyes.
I will not. They dare not touch my person or my house. There
are five hundred soldiers at the castle. I will send express for them.
It will be too late. Already the time has expired in which I
should return, he said, as the tongue of the old South loudly tolled
the hour of seven.
Do you think, young man, that they will have the audacity to try
to injure my mansion? asked the governor, with some anxiety.
I will not answer for any acts of violence they may commit. Do
you hear that deep shout, your excellency. Not seeing me return,
they are moving hither to meet me, and to know what you say.
Father, be wise; dear father, do not sacrifice yourself. Be
entreated
,
and give them the promise! cried Lucy, with eloquent
pathos. Hark! those shouts are like the dashing of the angry surges
upon the shore. They grow nearer and louder, and each moment
ring more fiercely in my ears.
Your excellency, if you will be guided by reason and
self-preservation
,
you will not withhold the promise they solicit. Already the
street is filling with them before the house! he cried, as he looked
from the window upon the dark masses of men moving towards the
gate, their stern faces made visible by the glare of a hundred pine
torches. Look at this scene, your excellency, and as a friend I
would urge upon you to give the pledge.
Father, for my sake, if you love me, yield! cried Lucy, pale
with terror as she looked forth.
The governor walked to the window and gazed out upon the
agitated
multitude, with their torches, banners, and clubs swayed and
brandished
above the heaving surface. The banners were displayed so
as to be distinctly read from the windows. Upon them were,
No Stamps.
No Taxation Without Representation.
Vox PopuliVox Dei.
No Tyrants, nor Tyrants' Tools.
Down with Hutchinson.
You see, sir, the state of the public mind, said Fleming,
observing
that the governor looked alarmed.
A single word from you, dear father, and all this storm, which
seems ready to pour its fury upon our heads, will be allayed.
The governor was silent. He struggled between pride and
hatred of the colonists, and personal fear. Duty to the crown was
little
in his thoughts as a motive to obstinacy. The mob now began to
cry out loudly for Fleming. Thomas Crafts, and seven or eight of the
leaders entered the gate, from which the sentinel had fled on their first
approach.
There is no time to be lost, your excellency! said Fleming.
I will not yield the promise, answered this singular man, in a
determined tone, that under a higher motive, would have commanded
admiration. But his intense and bitter hatred of the colonists,
transcended
for the moment, his fear of personal injury; and under its
influence he answered as he did.
Fleming saw that there was not an instant for delay, as Crafts, with
the current of the mob setting after him, was near the door; and
seeing
Fleming, he called to him to come out.
Lucy, there is no further safety here! cried Fleming. Fly
through the garden, and seek shelter at my mother's. No! do not
venture into the streets alone. Stay by the gate for me. I will
follow
you in a few moments. Governor, if you would save your life,
follow your daughter. I assure you, that I shall no sooner report your
refusal, than your house will be assaulted with a fury that will be
irresistible.
Master Fleming, do you come out, or shall we come in and fetch
you? cried Thomas Crafts.
Fleming lingered an instant, till he saw Lucy safely beyond the
fated dwelling, and then returned to open the door. The governor
was in the hall, standing irresolute.
Mr. Field, do you believe that they will dare to enter my house?
I can barricade the doors and windows.
You hear them already beating loudly upon the door! You have
yet time to turn aside this tornado. Bars and bolts will be like straws
before them.
Ere the governor could reply, the door was dashed in as if with a
catapult. Hutchinson fled to one of the back rooms, with a cry of
fear. Crafts and Fleming met in the hall, face to face.
We have waited, Master Fleming, past the hour. What says the
petty tyrant?
He refuses to give the promise, I am sorry to say.
The tyrant refuses! cried Crafts, shouting to the people who
were crowding up the steps.
He refuses! He wont promise! Down with him! was echoed
from mouth to mouth, till the very skies rung with the vast uproar.
Let us down with the house! cried Crafts, in a voice that rose
above the rest. Torches, men! Axes and torches! Down with
the tyrant's palace! We will smoke the fox out of his hole! Light
up, men! Torches to the four corners!
The work of destruction and devastation now commenced. The
mob divided themselves into bands. Some set fire to the corners of
the house, others rushed into the rooms, both up stairs and below, with
axes and bludgeons, destroying the furniture, and casting it forth to
heap upon a bonfire. Costly pier glasses were shivered at a blow,
and chandeliers torn from the chains which suspended them, and
dashed out of the windows. The valuable library was demolished,
and papers of immense value destroyed.
Here is a drawer full of gold and silver! cried a man aloud, as
he split open a secretary with a broad-axe. We shall make money,
my friends! and he began to fill his pockets, while others came up
to do the same.
Throw that gold into the bon-fire! suddenly cried Crafts,
pointing
to a large fire burning in the court; not a dollar of it shall go into
any man's pocket. We have not come here to rob the tyrant! Not
a farthing's worth of value shall be taken away by any man! The
flames shall consume all! At length the mansion, by far the most
magnificent and best furnished house in the colony, was destroyed.
The plate, the pictures, the furniture, the apparel of the governor,
and nine hundred pounds in specie were destroyed. The governor's
coach, which had been preserved from the conflagration of the stables,
was then dragged into the street, and an effigy of the governor,
dressed
in the laced clothes and cocked hat which had been found in the
house, was placed in it, and thus marched in triumph through the
city. Behind and before the coach, were fastened placards, reading,
No Stamps.
In the procession one person carried a large square banner, on
which was represented a man with Liberty inscribed upon his hat,
with his foot in the act of stamping upon the neck of a man, who was
labelled Doctor Stamp Act. Beneath the devise, were the words
in large letters,
We have no Stamps but the feet of Freemen.
The procession proceeded to the liberty tree, and here hanged the
effigy of the governor, placing in one of his hands a paper, purporting
to be the dying confession of the stamp act; and in the other hand a
picture of a horned devil, labelled, Hutchinson's Prime Minister.
While these scenes were being enacted in one quarter of the town,
events of equal interest were going forward in another. The party
led by William Lee having reached the Long Wharf, placed
themselves
in concealment in an old store-house, near the head of it, and
waited for the passing of the bales of stamped paper. At length, after
an hours time, a spy came from the end of the wharf, reporting that
the bales, sixteen in number, were landed, and were being packed in a
cart, which the governor had sent for the purpose of conveying them to
Mr. Oliver's store-house. William Lee, upon the receipt of this
intelligence
,
selected ten of the most resolute of his party, and instructed
them how to act. The cart, at length, came rumbling along, and
passed the spot were they were in ambush. It was drawn by two
horses, and about a dozen marines walked on either side of it in file.
Now, my friends, to the capture. Each of you single out his
man, take his musket, and leave him to be bound by those who follow.
Lee then bounded forward. His men reached the cart at the same
moment with himself. The guard was in a moment surprised,
disarmed
,
and given into the charge of the remainder of the party. Not
a gun was fired; scarcely a word spoken, till the cart with its contents
were in the possession of its resolute captors.
Now, my friends, we have got the lion, said William Lee. We
will look at his teeth.
At these words, a bale was cut open with a cutlass, and the
stamped paper exhibited to their various inspection.
Now what is to be done with this?
Fire, William, tells no tales, answered a man of the party.
True, and they will burn as well as any paper. But we will first
destroy Oliver's store; for by the light and the report of this lad, our
friends are busy burning. Hutchinson's mansion. This store was
erected as a stamp office, and it must come down.
In less than half an hour, the new brick edifice was levelled with
the ground. The cart, containing the bales of stamped paper, was
then escorted up King street, with sheets of the paper displayed on
poles above it, and rendered visible by the light of torches. The
rumor
of what Lee and his party had done, soon spread throughout the
town, and reached the mob assembled around the liberty tree, which,
with fresh shouts of triumph, mounted their effigies upon old horses,
and moved in procession to meet Lee's advancing party.
CHAPTER X.
SAUL AND THE HUZZAR OFFICER.
THE licutenant governor had succeeded in escaping from the
fury
of the enraged mob by flying from his house through his
gardens
,
the moment he beheld their leader enter his hall. He then
saw that his faith in the people's reverence for a king's governor's
house and his person was wholly fallacious. He repented when it
was too late; and overwhelmed with dismay at the crisis that
assailed
his ears, and with bodily fear he hurried after his daughter, who,
when Fleming left her in the gardens to return to speak with
Thomas
Crafts, had, with noble filial devotion, flown back to suffer with
her father whatsoever might befall him.
My child! cried the governor as he beheld her; fly and
escape
.
The house will be in flames, and these fierce men will not
even spare you. Take my arm and let us seek safety at Mr.
Oliver's
.
Alas, sir! cried Lucy; do you not hear the name of Mr.
Oliver
mingled with your own in their shouts. Come with me, my
dear father, and I will find for you a more humble and safer
assylum
Let us hasten then. If I am seen I am lost. They would not
hesitate to hang me up on the first tree. Let us escape on board
the ship, he cried, become nearly a child with fear, as he heard
behind
him the wild shouts, accompanied by the glare of the ascending
flames, by the light of which they threaded the avenues of the
garden
.
Lucy was firm and calm. She possessed one of those spirits
that always rise to the level of every emergency. She sustained
her father, rather than he her. She encouraged him by her coolness
and self-possession, and bade him yet hope for the best. She uttered
no word of reproach; betrayed no feeling, that all was the fruit of
his own proud and imperious temper.
Fleming, in the meanwhile, having returned into the hall,
endeavored
to stay the storm of violence which he saw bursting forth. He
ran here and there, made eloquent appeals to ears that were stopped
to words of forbearance. He dashed the torches from the hands that
were applying flames to the portico, and exposed his person to the
angry violence of his friends. But all was in vain. He saw that
the tempest would rage till it exhausted itself; and turning from the
painful scene, he hastened to the protection of the maiden whom he
had directed to await him in the gardens. Ere he reached her,
the roof of the mansion was in flames, and the glare of noon-day
lighted up half the town.
All is lost, sir! he cried to the governor. Nothing less than the
total destruction of the house and its contents will sate them.
My papers, my money, my valuable books! he exclaimed,
clasping
his hands in grief. Can nothing be saved?
Nothing, sir! Even your own life would be sacrificed, I fear,
should you be taken. I passed men searching for you as I came into
the garden, and turned them on another course. You have no time
to linger or bewail your misfortunes, sir. One word from you would
have averted all this great evil. Fleming spoke sternly; for he
felt that this act of the people would bring upon the colonies the
vengeance
of the crown, and wholly defeat the object all good men had
in viewthe repeal of the obnoxious act.
You are very kind, young sir, to take such an interest in the
safety
of myself and daughter. Do you know where we can find
shelter
until I can escape to the island?
Yes, your excellency. My own house, though humble, is at your
disposal. There your person will be as safe as my own.
As Fleming spoke, he opened the gate and preceded them, Lucy
leaning upon her father's arm. He was, however, so overcome on
turning back and beholding the flaming ruins of his magnificent
abode, that he had nearly fainted; but at the request of Lucy,
Fleming
supported him on one side, while she lent him her aid on the
other. In this way, their road made as plain as if lighted by the
sun, so brilliantly flashed upward the fiery tongues of flame, they at
length reached the abode of the young artisan, and were ushered by
him into the little sitting-room.
My dear mother and sister, said Fleming, I bring you as guests,
Governor Hutchinson and his daughter. They have been driven
from their home by violence and fire, and this house is to be sacred
to their security and repose, so long as they see fit to honor it.
Mrs. Field, with that gentle kindness of hospitality which wins the
heart, took the governor's chapeau and offered him her large
arm-chair
;
while Mary, folding Lucy in her arms, kissed her with tears
of sympathy.
Where is Landreth? asked Fleming, not seeing the young
secretary
.
He saw the flames shining into the windows, and fearing that it
was the governor's house, where he has left many valuable things, he
hastened at my urgent desire, to see and save what he could.
Then I fear he will be in danger. If men see him in their
present
madness, they will sieze upon his person. I must go at once
after
him.
But all men love him, Fleming, cried Mary between hope and
fear. They will net lay hands upon him.
I will not trust them, answered her brother. Yet I know not
how to leave you. My presence is needed at home if any should
seek the governor here.
Here is George returned! cried Mary as the young secretary
entered the room.
God be thanked! he cried, as he looked round upon the group,
and beheld the governor, Miss Hutchinson, and Fleming. I feared
the worst since I have witnessed what I have but now! he cried.
What a fearful pass things have got to be in the town. It appears
like a place carried by storm and given up to pillage and flames. The
wild shouts of the infuriated mob even reach us here. But now that
you are all safe, Fleming will remain here while I go and try to save
some thing from my room.
It will be rash to go near the terrific scene, cried Fleming. Your
position as the secretary of his excellency will expose you to insult.
I do not fear it. I will be cautious. If I find I am in danger I
will at once return, leaving my little property to its fate.
Fleming, finding that he was determined, made no further
objection
,
and Landreth departed, receiving at the door from Mary, an
earnest injunction not to place himself in the way of danger. When he
reached the gate of the garden he found it open, and bands of
persons
roving it in all directions, destroying the fruit tress and statues,
and carrying devastation every where. Pulling his cap down over
his eyes and concealing his features by the collar of his cloak, he
passed
up the garden towards a part of the house where his room was
situated, and which he saw was yet free from flames.
Suddenly two men darted from behind a tree and laid hands upon
him, rudely casting aside his cloak from his face.
Ah, pardon, Mr. Landreth, said one of the men. We didn't
know but it was Hutchinson, whom we are after. But, if you would
save trouble to yourself, get away from this as soon as you can.
There are men here that would not mind doing you an injury. I
speak as your friend.
Will it not be safe, Thomas Crafts, for me to go to my room. I
have a watch and money and private papers in my desk that I would
not willingly have consumed.
Which is your room?
That with the blind half open.
Describe the desk?
Cherry wood, inlaid with brass.
You shall not lose it if it is not now already too late to save it.
Go out of the garden and keep in some place of safety, at least for
twenty-four hours. If I can save the desk you will find it at my
house. Take my advice and leave this at once, for I am a friend to
you, though you are that man's secretary.
With these words, Crafts parted from him and hastened to the
burning mansion; while Landreth, following his kind advice, retired
without delay from the garden. He was hastening back to Fleming's
house, when he suddenly recollected Cleverling and Saul.
Not having seen the latter since he sent him after the former, he
believed that he must have got possession of his person. It was but
ten minutes walk to the old mill, and he therefore determined to go
to it and see if Saul had fulfilled his instructions. The street in which
he was terminated in an open field at a stile, from which a path led
round the base of the Beacon hill to the point on the west side. Upon
this point was an old mill for several years disused. A narrow
footpath
led to it, and seldom trodden save by boys, who used to visit the
mill to rob the numerous swallows' nests that were built beneath the
eves.
The foot-way to it was now as light as if the full moon gave her
light; and the red reflection of the distant conflagration gave it a
wilder and still more desolate appearance.
At length he came before it and listened to hear any sounds
within
.
All was still. The door, broken from its hinges, gave him access
to the interior, and he entered, for he thought he discerned the
glimmer
of a light from the second floor. He was not deceived. It
shone full down the stairway upon him as he advanced.
Saul! he called aloud.
Ah, is it you, Master Georgy? answered the natural in a
gratified
voice. I am glad you got here, Georgy, for I want to go to the
fire. There never was a fire in Boston town that Saul wasn't there
to see the sport. Ah, Master Georgy, its rare fun to see the flames
dart and wriggle and spit and crackle and shoot up into the sky, and
to hear the fire-folks holler, and the engines rattle-rattle, and see the
spouts of water shoot to the top o' the roof. Come, Georgy, take him,
and let Saul go to the fire.
Have you then got Cleverling, Saul? asked Landreth, as he
placed
his foot upon the upper step of the flight which he had been
ascending
while Saul was speaking.
Yes, and I've done my part, and you may hang him or set him
a-fire, Georgy. I never learned the trade of a barber, but my work
is well done,look Georgy.
Landreth did not require to be directed to the corner of the mill,
where, visible by the light of a blazing knot stuck in a crevice of a
shattered mill-stone, sat an extraordinary looking object. At first he
did not know what to make of it, whether to call it a man or a beast.
But groans, mingled with deep curses, and the most bitter
lamentations
assailing his ears, he knew the object was human, and he
recognized
the voice as Cleverling's. His head had been closely
shaven
,
and then covered with a coat of pitch, in which was stuck a mass
of dried grass and twigs. His features were blackened and then
crossed
with red ochre, in stripes, like an Indian warrior's visage. A sheep
skin was tied about his neck and shoulders, and the lower part of his
body was encased in a long meal sack. A rope was noosed around
his neck and fastened to a beam above his head. Landreth gazed
upon him with pity, amazement, and a strong desire to laugh.
So, then, fiend! cried Cleverling in a terrible voice, you are
the instigator of this! This is your work! This is your revenge!
You may as well let this devil incarnate finish his work by hanging
me up!
I assure you that I authorized nothing of this kind, answered
Landreth, in tones of real commiseration at the pitiful situation in
which he saw his enemy. I wished to have you brought here that
we might alone and without publicity, have our quarrel adjusted with
our swords. I came here to meet you in mortal combat, for the
maiden
whom you would have dishonored is my betrothed bride. But
this treatment you have received, I am no party to. Saul, you have
done wrong.
I have done just what he deserved. When I was shaving his
head I kept sayin' Mary, and so I had no pity. I tied his head
between
them two beams, for he was hard to shave. I told him if he
moved I'd kill him. So he was quiet, but he cried like a baby,
Georgy. But I thought of Sissy Menny, and I wouldn't pity him.
You have had punishment enough, Mr. Cleverling. You are in
no situation now for me to take vengeance upon you. I am satisfied
with what you have received. Severe as it is, it is no more than
you deserve. It will keep you out of society two or three months,
until your fine locks grow again, and I trust that the interval of
retirement
will be passed by you in wholesome resolutions of
amendment
.
Saul, remove the rope, the skin and sack. If it was in my
power I would restore your hair, sir, for I do not glory over a fallen
foe. I would much rather have taken the matter in my own
sword-hand
,
if Saul had not forestalled me. Shall I send a carriage for
you? asked the generous young man, kindly, as Saul took off these
outward appendages. The pitch and grass were not easily removed,
and he still presented a frightful spectacle about the face and head.
At the command of Landreth, Saul, who was now as passive and
docile as a child, went after a carriage, which he brought to the
stile, where Cleverling, accompanied by the kind Landreth, met it.
Where will you go? asked Landreth.
To Mr. Oliver's, answered Cleverling, bitterly.
That house is in danger from the town's-people. You had best
go to some inn. If you wish it, I will ride with you and speak for
a room for you. My cloak you shall have to completely envelope
your head and face!
You are kind! I should like to have you go with me, answered
the wretched young man, deeply impressed with the kindness of the
person he had so greatly wronged. He was completely humbled
and spirit-broken. He felt not even resentment against Saul, who
had caught him up as he was crossing the street near Mr. Oliver's,
borne him off upon his back, and committed upon his person such
hideous outrages. He felt humiliated, subdued and despicable in his
own eyes.
Landreth fulfilled his charitable duty by leaving Cleverling in a
chamber of the inn under the care of a servant. For two months
Cleverling kept his room. The act of Saul had been referred to the
excesses of the populace, and in England the report went that a
British officer had been tarred and feathered by the colonists from
their hostility to the crown. Cleverling never unfolded the truth of
the matter for his own reputation's sake; and as he got credit by his
supposed sufferings in the cause of his country, there seemed no
necessity
for divulging the secret. He, however, was taught a good
lesson by the treatment he had undergone, and in his conscience
fully justified it; and ere he left the colony, three months afterwards,
he voluntarily called on Mary Field, now become the happy bride
of George Landreth, and making a full apology for the gross insult
offered to her, asked both her forgiveness and that of her husband.
In the vessel in which Captain Cleverling, for he had received
promotion since his misfortune, sailed for London, went passengers,
Mr. Hutchinson, ex-governor of the colony, his daughter, and
Fleming
Field. The latter went out as one of a committee of three
gentlemen
,
for the purpose of urging the repeal of the act, and laying
before the crown other affairs touching the weal and prosperity of
the colonies.
The stamp paper which was landed from the English ship, after
having been paraded through the streets under a pall, with tolling of
the bells as for a funeral, was taken to the Common and consumed
amid the shouts of triumph of the multitude. There were, however,
a few other bales still on ship-board, which the governor, the next
day, gave up to the people; and at the same time he pledged
himself
not to take any steps to enforce the stamp duty until an answer
could be received from the petitions about to be addressed to the
crown.
Such, briefly, is the history of the Stamp Act in its effects upon
the people of Boston. Their example was followed by the other
colonies, which united in one spirit of resistance. At length England
opened her eyes, and saw before her either repeal, or the alternative
of losing her colonies. The bill to repeal the obnoxious act was
introduced into Parliament, and the venerable Pitt once more lifted
up his influential voice in its behalf. The bill passed by a large
majority, and the Stamp Act, which at one time threatened to
involve
the colonies in a sanguinary civil war, was
repealed!
The effects of this effort to bind the colonies, however, did not
pass away with the annihilation of the act. A serious blow had
been struck at the harmony which for a century had existed between
the colonies and the mother country, and in ten years afterwards
broke out the war of independence, hastened by further acts of
despotic power on the part of the crown. Within the bales of the
stamped paper was contained the germ of that tree of liberty whose
branches overshadow twenty-eight independent States.
The mission to the Court of St. James, undertaken by Fleming.
Field and his coadjutors, was successful. Through their statements,
and mainly through the eloquent representations of Fleming to the
leading men of the House of Lords, and even before the king, with
whom he had audience, the bill was introduced into Parliament and
finally carried.
After our hero had seen this great result achieved, he turned his
heart and thoughts towards the noble maiden, whom in the bustle of
political scenes he had little time to think upon. Lucy was at her
father's seat in Sussex, and thither, by invitation from Mr.
Hutchinson
,
he hastened, the second day after the repeal of the act. Here
he was kindly received by the ex-governor, who had never ceased
to be grateful to him for his attention and kindness at the
conflagration
of his mansion; and when, as the time drew near to embark for
Boston, Fleming asked his daughter's hand in marriage, he did not
withhold his consent, for he had been already advised of their mutual
attachment through her.
Take her, young man, said he, kindly. You, who have twice
saved her life, with mine, are certainly entitled to her!
Fleming was married a few days afterwards, and directly sailed,
with his fair bride, to Boston, where his descendants now hold
distinguished
positions in society, and wield great influence in the councils
of the republic. Landreth, after two years residence in Boston,
went suddenly to England to inherit the title and estate of the Earl
of Ludlow, from which he had been from early childhood defrauded
through the knavery of an uncle, who had declared no such heir to
exist. Thus the gentle and lovely Mary Field became the Countess
of Ludlow, and her graces of character shone as brightly in her
elevated
sphere as they had done in her lowly estate.
THE END.